http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Barry.t.html?ex=1336104000&en=0cec8c6324a9317c&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Send: The Essential Guide to Email for Office and Home - David Shipley and Will Schwalbe 2007 A few years back, when my son was in college, he had to mail a letter. I don’t remember the specific reason, but I do remember having a conversation with him in which he complained bitterly about the amount of work involved — finding a place where he could purchase a stamp, figuring out what kind of stamp he needed, actually writing the letter, locating an envelope, putting the letter into the envelope, having to physically leave his dormitory room to mail the envelope and so on. I grew exhausted just listening to him describe this series of arduous tasks, one coming right after another. I was glad, for my son’s sake, that he never had to live in a world — as I once did — where the only way to change channels was to walk all the way to the TV set and manually turn a knob. Essential Guide to Email for Office and Home. By David Shipley and Will Schwalbe. 247 pp. Alfred A. Knopf. $19.95. Unlike my son, I did not grow up with e-mail and texting, but I have come to agree with him: electronic communication is superior to the old-fashioned paper kind. I do almost all of my communicating by e-mail. I’ve been known to e-mail people who were literally standing next to me, which I know sounds crazy, because at that distance I could easily call them on my cellphone. But I prefer e-mail, because it’s such an effective way of getting information to somebody without running the risk of becoming involved in human conversation. I’ve become so dependent on e-mail that I sometimes wonder how we ever got by without it. Imagine, for example, how useful it would have been for Paul Revere. Instead of having to climb onto a horse in the middle of the night and ride through Massachusetts spreading the alarm, he could have simply whipped out his , fired off a quick message to the patriots in Lexington and Concord, then gone to sleep (unless he also had TiVo). Of course there might have been problems. Since Revere was typing with his thumbs, his e-mail probably would have said something like, “teh nritish are cming.” As a result the recipients might not have grasped the urgency of the message. The Concord patriots might have assumed it was mainly intended for the Lexington patriots, while Lexington might have assumed Concord was going to handle it, and we would still be British subjects today. I’m not saying that would be a bad thing; I’m just saying it was not what Revere meant to accomplish. E-mail, for all its efficiency, often fails to achieve its intended result; a vague or carelessly worded message can cause major problems — personal, legal and financial — for senders and receivers. Helping you avoid these problems is the goal of “Send,” an informative, entertaining, thorough and thoughtful book. The authors are media veterans — David Shipley is deputy editorial page editor of Will Schwalbe is editor in chief of Hyperion Books — with extensive, and not always positive, experience sending and receiving e-mail. They summarize their essential message in two rules: “Think before you send” and “Send e-mail you would like to receive.” These rules may seem obvious, but both are deceptively easy to break in our rapid-fire, multitasking world. Many of us, especially if we have handheld e-mail devices, routinely process e-mail while engaging in other activities such as walking, talking, eating and even (you know who you are) driving. I am not proud of this, but I have processed e-mail while accompanying my 6-year-old daughter on the “Small World” ride at World. These are not ideal conditions for thoughtfulness. It’s impossible to concentrate fully on your e-mail when you’re distracted, especially by animated dolls shrieking about international understanding. You’re going to get careless; you’re going to make mistakes in both content and tone. And there are many, many mistakes to be made. In “Send,” Shipley and Schwalbe describe in detail the alarming array of ways you can botch e-mail even before you start writing the message. These include using a misleading or meaningless subject (“Re: Re: Re:”); addressing the e-mail to the wrong recipients, or too many of them; putting somebody in the “To” list who should be a “Cc” or vice versa; and misusing the sneaky “Bcc” and “Forward” commands, which can easily cause a confidential message to become very public indeed. The authors also touch on a pet peeve of mine: people who abuse the “Reply All” command. Perhaps you are one of them. You receive a message addressed to many recipients — often a much-recycled joke, story, list, urban myth, etc. There are millions of these floating around; many of us simply delete them unread. But you, the “Reply All” abuser, read it and decide to respond with some clever comment of your own (such as “LOL”). And instead of hitting “Reply,” which would inflict your reply only on the sender, you hit “Reply All,” thereby forcing everybody on the recipient list to receive, and delete, yet another useless piece of e-mail. Please do not take this personally, “Reply All” people, but: everybody hates you. We hate you almost as much as we hate the people who mass-mail this Internet sludge in the first place. Dave Barry's most recent book is “Dave Barry’s Money Secrets, Like: Why Is There a Giant Eyeball on the Dollar?” 6th ANNUAL YEAR IN IDEAS; Literary Spam THE FUNNY PAGES: III: SUNDAY SERIAL; The Outlook: Chapter 4: A Threatening Message ESSAY; Literary Letters, Lost In Cyberspace Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Movie Review | '28 Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Kunkel.t.html Nirvana: The Biography - Everett True 2007 Until I received the assignment to review Everett True’s “Nirvana,” I hadn’t listened to the band much in recent years. In this I suspect I’m like most of us who were in our late teens or early 20s when Nirvana’s singer, songwriter and guitarist, Kurt Cobain, died in April 1994, hardly two and a half years after the release of “Nevermind.” There was so much hype — inevitable word — over Nirvana and its demise that the music later seemed somehow buried beneath the ephemera it occasioned. It became almost embarrassing to listen, in one’s dorm room, to Cobain’s strangely sarcastic and inviting voice, when journalists had called him the voice of our generation. And the band’s tortured ambivalence over its tremendous popularity grew to seem sadly quaint. When “Nevermind” came out, the marketing of the Persian Gulf war as a blockbuster action film was a fresh outrage, as was the recruitment of the ’ song “Revolution” as an advertising jingle; we were not yet thoroughly familiar with the emotional indecency of commercialization. We are now four years into the gulf war’s skillfully marketed sequel, while Cobain’s widow, , has recently licensed her husband’s song “Breed” for use by a manufacturer of video games. How to listen to the anthems of the early ’90s in what are already the late ’00s? What does “Smells Like Teen Spirit” sound like when you’re in your 30s, as Kurt Cobain, dead at 27, of course will never be? 636 pp. Da Capo Press. Paper, $19.95. You might hope that True would take up these questions and convincingly assess the band’s music and legacy. After all, this is not the first book to tell the story of Nirvana’s emergence “from the bowels of a redneck logger town called Aberdeen, WA,” as Cobain put it in a press release accompanying the unknown band’s first single, and the group’s achievement (to cite the same mock-grandiose document) of “success, fame and a following of millions.” Michael Azerrad’s “Come as You Are,” published in 1993 and written with Nirvana’s cooperation, provides an intimate sense of Cobain and his band mates, Dave Grohl and Krist Novoselic, even if it scants their backgrounds and minimizes Cobain’s heroin problem. Another notable piece of Nirvanology is Charles R. Cross’s “Heavier Than Heaven” (2001), an insightful and fairly well-written Cobain biography, however badly marred by the author’s deference to Courtney Love’s version of events and a fictional reconstruction of Cobain’s final hours. True might have built on the work of his precursors and distilled some insight from his own experience as the journalist who perhaps spent the most time with the band. Yet for something billed as the band’s definitive biography, “Nirvana” is an oddly marginal and sketchy production. The joyous, pounding attack of Grohl’s drumming and Novoselic’s slinky, insinuating bass lines were as important to Nirvana’s sound as what the band’s first producer accurately called Cobain’s “cool scream.” However, neither Grohl nor Novoselic consented to be interviewed, and True has fallen out with his old friend Courtney Love, the actor, musician and celebrity provocateur Cobain married in 1992. “Nirvana” consists largely of long, apparently unedited chunks of interviews with bit players in the band’s story, and True hardly attempts to adjudicate among competing points of view, to assign relative importance to different events or even to determine whether Nirvana really merits the special treatment of a 600-and-some-page biography. “Why would one band be favored over the other?” he asks. It’s a mystery, too, why True favors some factual considerations over others. “The first commonly agreed occurrence of a totally smashed guitar happened at Evergreen State College on Oct. 30” is his deadpan historian’s judgment. Other, more obviously important matters don’t concern him. He reproduces, seemingly in their entirety, long articles he once wrote for the British magazine Melody Maker, but doesn’t so much as quote from Cobain’s suicide note. And then there is the question, uncomfortably difficult to dismiss, whether Cobain composed a suicide note at all, rather than a draft of a goodbye letter to fans (Nirvana was on the verge of announcing its breakup) later doctored by another hand. Max Wallace and Ian Halperin’s “Love & Death” (2005) is a disquieting collation of the circumstantial and forensic evidence suggesting Cobain was murdered, and True might at least have considered the persistent questions hanging over this most famous of rock ’n’ roll suicides. The one outstanding virtue of True’s book is his close attention to musical politics, especially Cobain’s ambivalent relationship to the puritanically anticommercial, do-it-yourself ethos he discovered among the musicians of Olympia, Wash., where he lived for several years. “Hello, we’re major-label corporate rock sellouts,” Cobain declared to a crowd in early 1991, not long after the band signed with the Company; and Nirvana could never decide whether its success counted as victory or appeasement. What True appreciates most about Nirvana appears to be its tolerant, feminist sexual politics, unusual in a band owing such a debt to heavy metal. Cobain and Novoselic French-kissed on “Saturday Night Live” (something NBC edited out of rebroadcasts of the show), and Cobain was never shy in interviews about expressing his admiration for women. It introduced something new to the world of crunching, Black Sabbath-esque riffs when he wore a prom dress to MTV’s “Headbangers Ball” — after all, he winningly explained, it was a ball. And yet the power of Nirvana’s music had little to do with the promise of, in True’s words, a “less macho, more female-led” rock ’n’ roll. As an erotic politician (in Jim Morrison’s memorable definition of the rock star), Kurt Cobain believed in men and women getting along. As a songwriter, he was more preoccupied with the difficulty of getting along with himself. Benjamin Kunkel is an editor of n+1 magazine and novel “Indecision.” on the Inside Smells Like Civic Spirit MEDIA; Nine Years After Cobain's Death, Big Sales for All Things Nirvana THE POP LIFE; By Kurt Cobain, Re: Himself complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Forever Fab Beatles Commemorative Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Paglia.t.html?ex=1336104000&en=c73588b3b2e69e4a&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Teenage: The Creation of Youth Culture - Jon Savage Young and the Restless Fans wait for a glimpse of Frank Sinatra, Los Angeles, 1944. 2007 When did teenage angst and arrogance begin? Many baby boomers, still fighting over the legacy of the 1960s as they lurch toward retirement, think of themselves as products of the rock ’n’ roll rebellion that shattered the bourgeois proprieties of the 1950s. Chronicled in song and witnessed by the new electronic media, the impudent saga of the ’60s counterculture seemed unique. Creation of Youth Culture. Illustrated. 549 pp. Viking. $29.95. Jon Savage’s massive new book, “Teenage: The Creation of Youth Culture,” provides the prequel. There has in fact been wave after wave of youthful defiance — Savage begins his study in the 19th century — whether idealistic or hedonistic or both. The author of “England’s Dreaming: Anarchy, Sex Pistols, Punk Rock and Beyond,” Savage seems more at home with popular culture than with the fine arts. Hence the material in “Teenage” on ragtime, swing and the movies is stronger than that on modernist painters and poets. Savage traces his interest in generational insurrection to his childhood in the tranquil London suburbs of the 1950s and ’60s. His father was a World War II veteran, and the legacy of that war was still visible in the bombed-out districts of England’s major cities. Savage feels that the “unresolved horror” of the war period “informed the extreme manifestations of youth culture” in which he “thoroughly immersed” himself during the 1960s and ’70s. “Teenage” takes a while to hit its stride. The first chapter awkwardly interweaves the journal of Marie Bashkirtseff (a Russian-born painter who died of tuberculosis at the age of 25 in Paris in 1884) with the grisly crimes of a 15-year-old serial child murderer, Jesse Pomeroy, who was jailed in 1874 in Massachusetts. This strained pairing, with its manufactured shock, was all too typical of pretentious academic books in postmodernist cultural studies in the late 1980s and ’90s. Worse, the chapter ends with a whiplash-inducing jump backward to the late 18th century of Rousseau and Goethe — the crucible of youth-powered Romanticism that should have been front and center at the start. Given this book’s sympathy to every modern glimmer of homosexuality, it is strange that there is no discussion of the ancient Greeks’ glorification of youth, which was revived by Italian Renaissance artists like Donatello and Michelangelo. But once it gets going, “Teenage” becomes compulsive reading. Savage parallels the “militarist vision for youth” promoted by newly industrial and aggressively nationalist Germany in the 1870s and ’80s to the “cult of masculinity” and bullying suppression of individuality embodied in team sports in elite British schools, which shaped boys for imperial service. Savage amusingly juxtaposes the earnest social prototype of the “muscular Christian” with the capricious iconoclasm of Arthur Rimbaud and . Missing, however, is the Romantic lineage of these writers in Théophile Gautier and other aesthetes : not everything in literature should be interpreted as a direct response to current events or social conditions. The portrait of Wilde is distorted in treating him only as a decadent and an oppressed gay outcast. Wilde’s success as a writer of stage comedies, as well as a bon vivant who catered to the elite, is ignored. Furthermore, when Savage says that “Wilde’s influence over the young was a central issue” at his two trials and that he was accused of “sodomy with 12 youths,” the running theme of social class is oddly erased. Wilde’s violation of class borders in consorting with grooms, valets and coachmen was a major point raised against him in court — and one he did not honestly answer. Savage’s account of the “Apaches” — criminal bands of “inner urban savages” — of early-20th-century Paris is fascinating, but in rightly calling them “essentially a media creation” he neglects to trace their popular lineage. Apache dancing — a fierce psychodrama of sex war — would be introduced to film by Rudolph Valentino and would linger as an erotic trope well into the Beat era, as can be seen in Audrey Hepburn’s brilliant feminist parody of it in a Parisian nightclub in “Funny Face.” Whether L. Frank Baum’s “Wonderful Wizard of Oz,” published in 1900, should be classified as an artifact of youth culture seems questionable. Savage is on firm ground when he links Baum’s Emerald City to the White City of the World’s Columbian Exposition. But tornado-tossed Dorothy belongs to an earlier fairy-tale tradition of the questing girl-child, revived in Lewis Carroll’s spunky Alice. Camille Paglia is the university professor of humanities and media studies at the University of the Arts in Philadelphia. She is the author, most recently, of “Break, Blow, Burn.” Conditions and Trends Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Movie Review | '28 Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: OPERA Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Miles.t.html?ex=1336104000&en=d83136530f7abcc4&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss The Cigarette Century - Allan M. Brandt 2007 It is a familiar exchange: I step up to the counter at a convenience store and order my daily ration of Camel cigarettes, which I have been smoking since the Reagan administration and, as it happens, am smoking as I type this. Sliding the pack across the counter, the clerk — female clerks, typically; male clerks are more laissez-faire — sighs and says to me, “You know you need to quit.” My response, well honed over the years, goes like this: “I know I should quit,” I say, “but there’s one problem. I enjoy it.” On rare occasions, the clerk startles and smiles — that’s how it played out this morning — as if tickled by this forbidden admission. Far more frequently, however, I find myself at the receiving end of a uniformly bemused, pitying and faintly disgusted stare. I cannot possibly mean what I have just uttered, the stare says to me. The victim cannot confess to the crime. The cash register rings its tinny ring as the clerk slides the drawer shut and sadly wags her head. Rise, Fall, and Deadly Persistence of the Product That Defined America. By Allan M. Brandt. Illustrated. 600 pp. Basic Books. $36. Allan M. Brandt’s “Cigarette Century,” a fat chronicle of the rise and fall of the cigarette in the 20th century, delivers that same ruthful stare. Brandt, a professor of the history of medicine at Harvard Medical School, canvasses giant chunks of terrain here — the culture, science, politics, law and global spread of the cigarette, to cite just his section headings — without ever pausing to examine the central, vexing paradox of smoking: that in return for death, cigarettes give pleasure. Justifiable pleasure? Of course not. What Kant deemed “negative pleasure”? Perhaps. But pleasure nonetheless. Smokers, in Brandt’s view, are midwifed by an array of potent forces: ferocious tobacco advertising; peer pressure; cultural aesthetics (i.e., the imitable artfulness of Humphrey Bogart cupping a smoke); the addictive properties of nicotine; the tobacco industry’s pernicious campaign to obfuscate the perils of smoking; youthful longing for easy rebellion; and even, as evidenced by the boom in smoking after World War I, the scalding stress of trench warfare. But the cigarette itself, outside of its chemical components, gets scant credit. “One must not forget,” Jean Cocteau once wrote, “that the pack of cigarettes, the ceremony that extracts them, lights the lighter, and that strange cloud which penetrates us and which our nostrils puff, have with powerful charms seduced and conquered the world.” To be immune to those charms is naturally Brandt’s prerogative. To refuse or fail to acknowledge them in a history of the cigarette, however, is more problematic, and suggests the question: Is a cigarette sometimes just a cigarette? Or does the totality of its meanings — up to and including its flavors, fragrance and neurological kick — stem from a cultural moment, a peculiar and corporate-engineered hinge in time and place? “It seems striking,” Brandt writes, “that a product of such little utility, ephemeral in its very nature, could be such an encompassing vehicle for understanding the past. But the cigarette permeates 20th-century America as smoke fills an enclosed room.” The cigarette came of age with, and thanks to, dramatic advances in manufacturing technology and marketing tactics, and was further helped along by the tectonic shifts in consumer culture and social mores that followed World War I. It was, pun intended, a breathtakingly fast rise. In 1904, cigarettes accounted for only 5 percent of the domestic tobacco market. By midcentury, nearly half of all adults smoked. Cigarettes were ubiquitous, with ashtrays freckling every room: nurseries, doctors’ offices, TV news studios. The tobacco industry — a bad seed from the beginning, as Brandt shows (as early as 1908, the American Tobacco Company was battling the feds, this time over antitrust regulations) — nurtured and exploited that ubiquity. If the health hazards of smoking were not “proven” until midcentury, they were readily apparent. Yet scientists, early on, found themselves lumped together with antitobacco moralists in the public mind, which imbued their cautions with the shrill taint of Victorian finger-wagging. Carcinogenesis sounded a lot like degeneracy, and America was happy to blow a collective stream of smoke in the face of that charge. ll that changed in the early 1950s, when the causal relationship between smoking and lung cancer was finally “proven,” in scientific terms, and more formally “alleged,” in tobacco industry parlance. Faced with damning evidence, the industry devised a cagey defense: rather than denying the harms of smoking, it insisted there were “two sides” to the story, and corralled skeptical scientists — perennially available on any subject — to rebut or at least cast doubt upon the medical consensus. Journalists were urged to consider “fairness” and “balance” in covering the invented “controversy.” The industry’s public relations arm, Brandt writes, was “adept at taking a single dissenter and assuring widespread media coverage of his views.” This purposeful agnosticism, which served the tobacco industry well, will sound eerily familiar to anyone following the “debate” — another case in which a few pedigreed skeptics, whose views align with those of a powerful industry, are framing consensus as controversy. “The industry,” Brandt writes, “insisted on scientific criteria that it knew full well could not be attained then, or ever.” From this point on, “The Cigarette Century” morphs into combat history, into a meticulous record of the myriad courtroom clashes that defined the life of the cigarette in the latter years of the 20th century. Brandt’s admirable skills as a researcher and analyst are in full flower here, though readers searching for courtroom drama and more human scale should refer to Richard Kluger’s -winning “Ashes to Ashes,” a silkier, smoother narrative that tracked the tobacco wars up through the mid-1990s. If the tobacco trials have yet to extinguish the industry, as antismoking advocates have been hoping for years, they’ve certainly delivered mortal wounds — most effectively, perhaps, in the discovery process, which unearthed decades’ worth of slimy industry documents (including one industry idea Brandt quotes, from a 1987 brainstorming session, to deal with health concerns: “Create a bigger monster (AIDS)”) that has made every cigarette purchase since feel like a deal with the devil, on top of a dance with death. Additional tort action, and ramped-up regulation now that tobacco support has become more of a political liability than an advantage, seems likely to further chip away the number of domestic smokers until just a few of us will remain, huddled in the rain 500 feet away from any possible contact with others, impoverished from taxes and life insurance premiums and the inability to pass a nicotine-finding blood test in order to get a job. Yet the essential conundrum, succinctly stated in a 1961 tobacco-industry memo, will remain: “There are biologically active materials present in cigarette tobacco. These are: a) cancer causing; b) cancer promoting; c) poisonous; d) stimulating, pleasurable and flavorful.” Jonathan Miles contributes the “Shaken and Stirred” column to the Sunday Styles section Moon,' Smokeless Version 'The Least Secretive Life' Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Movie Review | '28 Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Bentley.t.html Thick as Thieves - Steve Geng 2007 “When they asked me why I lied, I lied,” confesses Steve Geng, small-time crook, sometime actor, drug addict and drunk. (Or is he lying and was he, in fact, telling the truth?) At the time, Geng was living at the Daytop Village rehab facility on Staten Island, wearing a “Pinocchio nose” and a can labeled “A Can of Lies” to remind him of his predilection. You’ve gotta love the literalness of recovery programs. of Steve Geng A Brother, a Sister — a True Story of Two Turbulent Lives. 292 pp. Henry Holt & Company. $24. First Chapter: ‘Thick as Thieves’ For anyone who still hasn’t reached personal closure with James “I am an Alcoholic and I am a Drug Addict and I am a Criminal” Frey and his self-aggrandizement, Geng’s memoir, “Thick as Thieves,” is here as a reminder: addicts lie as often as they need a fix. What was so disturbing about the Frey debacle was not his deceit, but that the entire world, and , were so surprised at his mendacity. I bet no friends of Bill’s were surprised. Geng’s memoir, his first book, is a welcome antidote to Freysian cynicism and does much to restore integrity to the genre of the addict memoir as presented in classics by William S. Burroughs, and Jerry Stahl — all true tales, no doubt. Geng’s story is tamer, to be sure, but he has earned his misery honestly: arriving in his mid-60s having been arrested some 30 times; spending, cumulatively, years in jail, less time in rehab; going head to head with a claw hammer; and being set on fire by a girlfriend. Geng’s story carries no dedication, but the book is clearly an elegy — and a confession — for his sister, Veronica Geng, the brilliant New Yorker writer and editor who died in 1997 at the age of 56. This memoir could have been called “Steve Loves Ron.” “Ron,” two years older than Steve, was the hero of his life. She was a fragile, sad, mercurial, difficult creature, but “her laugh was the clearest manifestation of love, and I learned early how to get it.” At their childhood home in Philadelphia, they are sitting one day at the breakfast table with bowls of steaming oatmeal in front of them. After their mother, Rosina, leaves the room, Ron suddenly rubs her hands in her hair and whispers: “Hey, Stevie. Shampoo!” “I was no dummy,” Geng writes. “I scooped up handfuls of porridge and plopped them on my head.” The glimpses of young Veronica are one of the chief delights of Geng’s story. Ron was a wit from the start, defending herself against her father, Charlie, a career Army officer whose inane, often drunken remarks — his “kiddin’ around” — “would reduce Ron to tears.” When she proudly displays her Easter shoes, her father comments, “Christ, you could land a plane on those skis.” The torture called teasing is an underreported form of insidious soul murder for many earnest little girls. To see just how far Ron took revenge, read her collection “Love Trouble,” a compendium of such militant satire and wicked irony that it will disinhibit your serotonin without a prescription. When Steve asks his big sister if they are ever going to grow up “like Mom and Daddy,” Ron replies: “Like dy? Jeez, I hope not.” She goes on to explain that “what Daddy did is more like ... photosynthesis.” “Charlie,” Rosina says one day to her husband, “did you see this beautiful new vacuum cleaner, the Hoover?” ver?” he responds. “We got Commies taking over the railroads and you’re telling me about a goddamned vacuum cleaner?” “We should definitely get the vacuum,” Ron adds, “before Commies take over the Hoover.” Charlie remained unimpressed with his daughter’s talent and intelligence her whole life. He was that kind of dad. Young Steve engages in cruder forms of subversion, like pulling his mother aside one day and pointing to one of his frequent adolescent erections, saying: “Hey, Mom. What’s this all about?” Ron gets A’s, Steve gets D’s and F’s. He has his first beer at the age of 8, and likes it plenty. His goal is simple: “Get out of the house.” Before long he is stealing and setting fires just for “the exquisite thrill of getting away with it.” Soon Charlie is making his “On the Waterfront” proclamation: “That kid’s a bum and he’s always gonna be a bum!” That kind of dad. “Although resentment isn’t quite the same thing as having a direction in life,” Geng writes in his lucid prose, “it revved me up and gave me some torque.” He is now ready for a life of sex, crime, drugs and rock ’n’ roll. His role models: “the hipster, the hophead and the hustler.” The locales change as Geng’s capers proceed. In Paris he enjoys the whores of Rue Pigalle: “She exuded a certain confidence now that I was a repeat customer. It was as close as I’d come at that point to having my own girlfriend.” Back in the States, Geng is soon on the lam in San Francisco for hot-wiring and crashing a car with a friend while high on methedrine. After a chase by the cops, who open fire, he is arrested and spends a few months in San Bruno County Jail. Out of prison he repairs to his parents’ house in Clearwater, Fla., for a little R & R, and works at Kentucky Fried Chicken. When he’s saved enough money, he heads to New York to resume his pursuit of “serious drugs.” He has his first taste of heroin and “finally found what I was looking for ... better than sex.” Did I mention that Chet Baker is one of Geng’s idols? Now that he’s found his métier, he develops his skills in “boosting” to support his habit. He becomes famous as “Record Steve,” stealing records under his coat, as many as 20 to 30 at a time, and selling them out of shopping bags on Eighth Street. His career trajectory is regularly interrupted by jail time — three months on , 30 days on Hart Island, almost a year in Pinellas County Jail, nine months in . Eat your heart out, James Frey. Toni Bentley, a former dancer with the New York City Ballet, is the author, most recently, of “The Surrender: An Erotic Memoir.” and Family Life complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Adirondacks Open Camp, 1903 Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Bentley.t.html?ex=1336104000&en=63c96734191f11f5&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Thick as Thieves - Steve Geng 2007 “When they asked me why I lied, I lied,” confesses Steve Geng, small-time crook, sometime actor, drug addict and drunk. (Or is he lying and was he, in fact, telling the truth?) At the time, Geng was living at the Daytop Village rehab facility on Staten Island, wearing a “Pinocchio nose” and a can labeled “A Can of Lies” to remind him of his predilection. You’ve gotta love the literalness of recovery programs. of Steve Geng A Brother, a Sister — a True Story of Two Turbulent Lives. 292 pp. Henry Holt & Company. $24. First Chapter: ‘Thick as Thieves’ For anyone who still hasn’t reached personal closure with James “I am an Alcoholic and I am a Drug Addict and I am a Criminal” Frey and his self-aggrandizement, Geng’s memoir, “Thick as Thieves,” is here as a reminder: addicts lie as often as they need a fix. What was so disturbing about the Frey debacle was not his deceit, but that the entire world, and , were so surprised at his mendacity. I bet no friends of Bill’s were surprised. Geng’s memoir, his first book, is a welcome antidote to Freysian cynicism and does much to restore integrity to the genre of the addict memoir as presented in classics by William S. Burroughs, and Jerry Stahl — all true tales, no doubt. Geng’s story is tamer, to be sure, but he has earned his misery honestly: arriving in his mid-60s having been arrested some 30 times; spending, cumulatively, years in jail, less time in rehab; going head to head with a claw hammer; and being set on fire by a girlfriend. Geng’s story carries no dedication, but the book is clearly an elegy — and a confession — for his sister, Veronica Geng, the brilliant New Yorker writer and editor who died in 1997 at the age of 56. This memoir could have been called “Steve Loves Ron.” “Ron,” two years older than Steve, was the hero of his life. She was a fragile, sad, mercurial, difficult creature, but “her laugh was the clearest manifestation of love, and I learned early how to get it.” At their childhood home in Philadelphia, they are sitting one day at the breakfast table with bowls of steaming oatmeal in front of them. After their mother, Rosina, leaves the room, Ron suddenly rubs her hands in her hair and whispers: “Hey, Stevie. Shampoo!” “I was no dummy,” Geng writes. “I scooped up handfuls of porridge and plopped them on my head.” The glimpses of young Veronica are one of the chief delights of Geng’s story. Ron was a wit from the start, defending herself against her father, Charlie, a career Army officer whose inane, often drunken remarks — his “kiddin’ around” — “would reduce Ron to tears.” When she proudly displays her Easter shoes, her father comments, “Christ, you could land a plane on those skis.” The torture called teasing is an underreported form of insidious soul murder for many earnest little girls. To see just how far Ron took revenge, read her collection “Love Trouble,” a compendium of such militant satire and wicked irony that it will disinhibit your serotonin without a prescription. When Steve asks his big sister if they are ever going to grow up “like Mom and Daddy,” Ron replies: “Like dy? Jeez, I hope not.” She goes on to explain that “what Daddy did is more like ... photosynthesis.” “Charlie,” Rosina says one day to her husband, “did you see this beautiful new vacuum cleaner, the Hoover?” ver?” he responds. “We got Commies taking over the railroads and you’re telling me about a goddamned vacuum cleaner?” “We should definitely get the vacuum,” Ron adds, “before Commies take over the Hoover.” Charlie remained unimpressed with his daughter’s talent and intelligence her whole life. He was that kind of dad. Young Steve engages in cruder forms of subversion, like pulling his mother aside one day and pointing to one of his frequent adolescent erections, saying: “Hey, Mom. What’s this all about?” Ron gets A’s, Steve gets D’s and F’s. He has his first beer at the age of 8, and likes it plenty. His goal is simple: “Get out of the house.” Before long he is stealing and setting fires just for “the exquisite thrill of getting away with it.” Soon Charlie is making his “On the Waterfront” proclamation: “That kid’s a bum and he’s always gonna be a bum!” That kind of dad. “Although resentment isn’t quite the same thing as having a direction in life,” Geng writes in his lucid prose, “it revved me up and gave me some torque.” He is now ready for a life of sex, crime, drugs and rock ’n’ roll. His role models: “the hipster, the hophead and the hustler.” The locales change as Geng’s capers proceed. In Paris he enjoys the whores of Rue Pigalle: “She exuded a certain confidence now that I was a repeat customer. It was as close as I’d come at that point to having my own girlfriend.” Back in the States, Geng is soon on the lam in San Francisco for hot-wiring and crashing a car with a friend while high on methedrine. After a chase by the cops, who open fire, he is arrested and spends a few months in San Bruno County Jail. Out of prison he repairs to his parents’ house in Clearwater, Fla., for a little R & R, and works at Kentucky Fried Chicken. When he’s saved enough money, he heads to New York to resume his pursuit of “serious drugs.” He has his first taste of heroin and “finally found what I was looking for ... better than sex.” Did I mention that Chet Baker is one of Geng’s idols? Now that he’s found his métier, he develops his skills in “boosting” to support his habit. He becomes famous as “Record Steve,” stealing records under his coat, as many as 20 to 30 at a time, and selling them out of shopping bags on Eighth Street. His career trajectory is regularly interrupted by jail time — three months on , 30 days on Hart Island, almost a year in Pinellas County Jail, nine months in . Eat your heart out, James Frey. Toni Bentley, a former dancer with the New York City Ballet, is the author, most recently, of “The Surrender: An Erotic Memoir.” and Family Life Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Movie Review | '28 Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Miles.t.html The Cigarette Century - Allan M. Brandt 2007 It is a familiar exchange: I step up to the counter at a convenience store and order my daily ration of Camel cigarettes, which I have been smoking since the Reagan administration and, as it happens, am smoking as I type this. Sliding the pack across the counter, the clerk — female clerks, typically; male clerks are more laissez-faire — sighs and says to me, “You know you need to quit.” My response, well honed over the years, goes like this: “I know I should quit,” I say, “but there’s one problem. I enjoy it.” On rare occasions, the clerk startles and smiles — that’s how it played out this morning — as if tickled by this forbidden admission. Far more frequently, however, I find myself at the receiving end of a uniformly bemused, pitying and faintly disgusted stare. I cannot possibly mean what I have just uttered, the stare says to me. The victim cannot confess to the crime. The cash register rings its tinny ring as the clerk slides the drawer shut and sadly wags her head. Rise, Fall, and Deadly Persistence of the Product That Defined America. By Allan M. Brandt. Illustrated. 600 pp. Basic Books. $36. Allan M. Brandt’s “Cigarette Century,” a fat chronicle of the rise and fall of the cigarette in the 20th century, delivers that same ruthful stare. Brandt, a professor of the history of medicine at Harvard Medical School, canvasses giant chunks of terrain here — the culture, science, politics, law and global spread of the cigarette, to cite just his section headings — without ever pausing to examine the central, vexing paradox of smoking: that in return for death, cigarettes give pleasure. Justifiable pleasure? Of course not. What Kant deemed “negative pleasure”? Perhaps. But pleasure nonetheless. Smokers, in Brandt’s view, are midwifed by an array of potent forces: ferocious tobacco advertising; peer pressure; cultural aesthetics (i.e., the imitable artfulness of Humphrey Bogart cupping a smoke); the addictive properties of nicotine; the tobacco industry’s pernicious campaign to obfuscate the perils of smoking; youthful longing for easy rebellion; and even, as evidenced by the boom in smoking after World War I, the scalding stress of trench warfare. But the cigarette itself, outside of its chemical components, gets scant credit. “One must not forget,” Jean Cocteau once wrote, “that the pack of cigarettes, the ceremony that extracts them, lights the lighter, and that strange cloud which penetrates us and which our nostrils puff, have with powerful charms seduced and conquered the world.” To be immune to those charms is naturally Brandt’s prerogative. To refuse or fail to acknowledge them in a history of the cigarette, however, is more problematic, and suggests the question: Is a cigarette sometimes just a cigarette? Or does the totality of its meanings — up to and including its flavors, fragrance and neurological kick — stem from a cultural moment, a peculiar and corporate-engineered hinge in time and place? “It seems striking,” Brandt writes, “that a product of such little utility, ephemeral in its very nature, could be such an encompassing vehicle for understanding the past. But the cigarette permeates 20th-century America as smoke fills an enclosed room.” The cigarette came of age with, and thanks to, dramatic advances in manufacturing technology and marketing tactics, and was further helped along by the tectonic shifts in consumer culture and social mores that followed World War I. It was, pun intended, a breathtakingly fast rise. In 1904, cigarettes accounted for only 5 percent of the domestic tobacco market. By midcentury, nearly half of all adults smoked. Cigarettes were ubiquitous, with ashtrays freckling every room: nurseries, doctors’ offices, TV news studios. The tobacco industry — a bad seed from the beginning, as Brandt shows (as early as 1908, the American Tobacco Company was battling the feds, this time over antitrust regulations) — nurtured and exploited that ubiquity. If the health hazards of smoking were not “proven” until midcentury, they were readily apparent. Yet scientists, early on, found themselves lumped together with antitobacco moralists in the public mind, which imbued their cautions with the shrill taint of Victorian finger-wagging. Carcinogenesis sounded a lot like degeneracy, and America was happy to blow a collective stream of smoke in the face of that charge. ll that changed in the early 1950s, when the causal relationship between smoking and lung cancer was finally “proven,” in scientific terms, and more formally “alleged,” in tobacco industry parlance. Faced with damning evidence, the industry devised a cagey defense: rather than denying the harms of smoking, it insisted there were “two sides” to the story, and corralled skeptical scientists — perennially available on any subject — to rebut or at least cast doubt upon the medical consensus. Journalists were urged to consider “fairness” and “balance” in covering the invented “controversy.” The industry’s public relations arm, Brandt writes, was “adept at taking a single dissenter and assuring widespread media coverage of his views.” This purposeful agnosticism, which served the tobacco industry well, will sound eerily familiar to anyone following the “debate” — another case in which a few pedigreed skeptics, whose views align with those of a powerful industry, are framing consensus as controversy. “The industry,” Brandt writes, “insisted on scientific criteria that it knew full well could not be attained then, or ever.” From this point on, “The Cigarette Century” morphs into combat history, into a meticulous record of the myriad courtroom clashes that defined the life of the cigarette in the latter years of the 20th century. Brandt’s admirable skills as a researcher and analyst are in full flower here, though readers searching for courtroom drama and more human scale should refer to Richard Kluger’s -winning “Ashes to Ashes,” a silkier, smoother narrative that tracked the tobacco wars up through the mid-1990s. If the tobacco trials have yet to extinguish the industry, as antismoking advocates have been hoping for years, they’ve certainly delivered mortal wounds — most effectively, perhaps, in the discovery process, which unearthed decades’ worth of slimy industry documents (including one industry idea Brandt quotes, from a 1987 brainstorming session, to deal with health concerns: “Create a bigger monster (AIDS)”) that has made every cigarette purchase since feel like a deal with the devil, on top of a dance with death. Additional tort action, and ramped-up regulation now that tobacco support has become more of a political liability than an advantage, seems likely to further chip away the number of domestic smokers until just a few of us will remain, huddled in the rain 500 feet away from any possible contact with others, impoverished from taxes and life insurance premiums and the inability to pass a nicotine-finding blood test in order to get a job. Yet the essential conundrum, succinctly stated in a 1961 tobacco-industry memo, will remain: “There are biologically active materials present in cigarette tobacco. These are: a) cancer causing; b) cancer promoting; c) poisonous; d) stimulating, pleasurable and flavorful.” Jonathan Miles contributes the “Shaken and Stirred” column to the Sunday Styles section Moon,' Smokeless Version 'The Least Secretive Life' complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Kunkel.t.html?ex=1336104000&en=43445b8c737aa45e&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Nirvana: The Biography - Everett True 2007 Until I received the assignment to review Everett True’s “Nirvana,” I hadn’t listened to the band much in recent years. In this I suspect I’m like most of us who were in our late teens or early 20s when Nirvana’s singer, songwriter and guitarist, Kurt Cobain, died in April 1994, hardly two and a half years after the release of “Nevermind.” There was so much hype — inevitable word — over Nirvana and its demise that the music later seemed somehow buried beneath the ephemera it occasioned. It became almost embarrassing to listen, in one’s dorm room, to Cobain’s strangely sarcastic and inviting voice, when journalists had called him the voice of our generation. And the band’s tortured ambivalence over its tremendous popularity grew to seem sadly quaint. When “Nevermind” came out, the marketing of the Persian Gulf war as a blockbuster action film was a fresh outrage, as was the recruitment of the ’ song “Revolution” as an advertising jingle; we were not yet thoroughly familiar with the emotional indecency of commercialization. We are now four years into the gulf war’s skillfully marketed sequel, while Cobain’s widow, , has recently licensed her husband’s song “Breed” for use by a manufacturer of video games. How to listen to the anthems of the early ’90s in what are already the late ’00s? What does “Smells Like Teen Spirit” sound like when you’re in your 30s, as Kurt Cobain, dead at 27, of course will never be? 636 pp. Da Capo Press. Paper, $19.95. You might hope that True would take up these questions and convincingly assess the band’s music and legacy. After all, this is not the first book to tell the story of Nirvana’s emergence “from the bowels of a redneck logger town called Aberdeen, WA,” as Cobain put it in a press release accompanying the unknown band’s first single, and the group’s achievement (to cite the same mock-grandiose document) of “success, fame and a following of millions.” Michael Azerrad’s “Come as You Are,” published in 1993 and written with Nirvana’s cooperation, provides an intimate sense of Cobain and his band mates, Dave Grohl and Krist Novoselic, even if it scants their backgrounds and minimizes Cobain’s heroin problem. Another notable piece of Nirvanology is Charles R. Cross’s “Heavier Than Heaven” (2001), an insightful and fairly well-written Cobain biography, however badly marred by the author’s deference to Courtney Love’s version of events and a fictional reconstruction of Cobain’s final hours. True might have built on the work of his precursors and distilled some insight from his own experience as the journalist who perhaps spent the most time with the band. Yet for something billed as the band’s definitive biography, “Nirvana” is an oddly marginal and sketchy production. The joyous, pounding attack of Grohl’s drumming and Novoselic’s slinky, insinuating bass lines were as important to Nirvana’s sound as what the band’s first producer accurately called Cobain’s “cool scream.” However, neither Grohl nor Novoselic consented to be interviewed, and True has fallen out with his old friend Courtney Love, the actor, musician and celebrity provocateur Cobain married in 1992. “Nirvana” consists largely of long, apparently unedited chunks of interviews with bit players in the band’s story, and True hardly attempts to adjudicate among competing points of view, to assign relative importance to different events or even to determine whether Nirvana really merits the special treatment of a 600-and-some-page biography. “Why would one band be favored over the other?” he asks. It’s a mystery, too, why True favors some factual considerations over others. “The first commonly agreed occurrence of a totally smashed guitar happened at Evergreen State College on Oct. 30” is his deadpan historian’s judgment. Other, more obviously important matters don’t concern him. He reproduces, seemingly in their entirety, long articles he once wrote for the British magazine Melody Maker, but doesn’t so much as quote from Cobain’s suicide note. And then there is the question, uncomfortably difficult to dismiss, whether Cobain composed a suicide note at all, rather than a draft of a goodbye letter to fans (Nirvana was on the verge of announcing its breakup) later doctored by another hand. Max Wallace and Ian Halperin’s “Love & Death” (2005) is a disquieting collation of the circumstantial and forensic evidence suggesting Cobain was murdered, and True might at least have considered the persistent questions hanging over this most famous of rock ’n’ roll suicides. The one outstanding virtue of True’s book is his close attention to musical politics, especially Cobain’s ambivalent relationship to the puritanically anticommercial, do-it-yourself ethos he discovered among the musicians of Olympia, Wash., where he lived for several years. “Hello, we’re major-label corporate rock sellouts,” Cobain declared to a crowd in early 1991, not long after the band signed with the Company; and Nirvana could never decide whether its success counted as victory or appeasement. What True appreciates most about Nirvana appears to be its tolerant, feminist sexual politics, unusual in a band owing such a debt to heavy metal. Cobain and Novoselic French-kissed on “Saturday Night Live” (something NBC edited out of rebroadcasts of the show), and Cobain was never shy in interviews about expressing his admiration for women. It introduced something new to the world of crunching, Black Sabbath-esque riffs when he wore a prom dress to MTV’s “Headbangers Ball” — after all, he winningly explained, it was a ball. And yet the power of Nirvana’s music had little to do with the promise of, in True’s words, a “less macho, more female-led” rock ’n’ roll. As an erotic politician (in Jim Morrison’s memorable definition of the rock star), Kurt Cobain believed in men and women getting along. As a songwriter, he was more preoccupied with the difficulty of getting along with himself. Benjamin Kunkel is an editor of n+1 magazine and novel “Indecision.” on the Inside Smells Like Civic Spirit MEDIA; Nine Years After Cobain's Death, Big Sales for All Things Nirvana THE POP LIFE; By Kurt Cobain, Re: Himself Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Movie Review | '28 Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Forever Fab Beatles Commemorative Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Harris.t.html?ex=1336104000&en=eb0d48826c104448&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss The Joy of Drinking - Barbara Holland ROBERT R. HARRIS Published: May 6, 2007 It’s odd the books people get asked to review. Take this one, a carefree history of our long love affair with drinking. I have no training as a historian, just some slight experience on both sides of bars. And perhaps an exaggerated reputation for disparaging today’s ubiquitous alcohol-free business lunches. Barbara Holland, though, might empathize. She reminds us that in 1787, two days before their work was done, the 55 delegates to the Constitutional Convention “adjourned to a tavern for some rest, and according to the bill they drank 54 bottles of Madeira, 60 bottles of claret, 8 of whiskey, 22 of port, 8 of hard cider and 7 bowls of punch so large that, it was said, ducks could swim around in them. Then they went back to work and finished founding the new Republic.” Note the 55 delegates and 54 bottles of Madeira. Which founder was slacking? JOY OF DRINKING 150 pp. Bloomsbury. $14.95. First Chapter: ‘The Joy of Drinking’ But “The Joy of Drinking” begins way before “our Revolution was born and raised in taverns.” It goes back some 10,000 years to when society, or what there was of it, went agricultural. Crops got planted and harvested, and some rotted and fermented, forming a liquid you could drink. The party began. Holland cites Faulkner as observing that civilization began with fermentation, and he’d have known. Drink, she writes, became “the social glue of the human race. Probably in the beginning we could explain ourselves to our close family members with grunts, muttered syllables, gestures, slaps and punches. Then when the neighbors started dropping in to help harvest, stomp, stir and drink the bounty of the land, after we’d softened our natural suspicious hostility with a few stiff ones, we had to think up some more nuanced communication, like words. From there it was a short step to grammar, civil law, religion, history and ‘The Whiffenpoof Song.’ ” And she sketches the evolution of this process around the globe: in China, India, Africa, the Islamic world (!), Europe and the Americas, though her reliance on Marco Polo as a source may raise an actual historian’s eyebrows. Beer was always big, and may even be healthy. The American Journal of Clinical Nutrition, Holland writes, “claims that a moderate beer drinker — whatever that means — swallows 11 percent of his dietary protein needs, 12 percent of the carbohydrates, 9 percent of essential phosphorus, 7 percent of his riboflavin, and 5 percent of niacin. Should he go on to immoderate beer drinking, he becomes a walking vitamin pill.” That last is an assertion upon which any given issue of Science Times will be sure to pounce. Still, I’ll take it, having long since abandoned hope of someone coming up with any health benefits of smoking. Holland slowly savors what E. B. White called, in that genteel New Yorker way, “the golden companionship of the tavern.” She notes that “in a proper pub everyone there is potentially, if not a lifelong friend, at least someone to lure into an argument about foreign policy or,” God help us all, “the Red Sox.” And she knows that “to extract the fullest flavor of our drinking house, we needed to spend serious evening time there, slowly coming to know the bartender and the regulars, their joys and sorrows.” But becoming a “regular” isn’t as easy as “Cheers” may have made it seem; a decent bar’s culture is tough to crack. Coffeehouses, it must be admitted, have often vied with bars for our affections. In Shakespeare’s day, Holland writes, “coffeehouses sprang up to challenge the taverns. The authorities were suspicious of the whole thing and sent spies to eavesdrop. In the taverns all was amiable and easy, but the coffeehouses were cauldrons of edgy malcontents.” Throw in some iPods and wired soccer moms and you could be at Starbucks. Holland traces the origin of the toast and of settling lawsuits “out of court” (in colonial America taverns were built next to courthouses, and opposing parties would go next door to talk things over). She describes the mechanics of hangovers and their cures and elaborates on the ceremony of mixing martinis. James Bond, she argues, was “the wave of the future, the drinker not as merrymaker,” personified by Nick and Nora Charles of “Thin Man” fame, but the drinker “as expert, authority, specialist.” And as you might guess, Holland, who has written a dozen or so previous books, has done impressive research on a subject dear to some of us — writers who drink. Mentioned are Johnson and Boswell, John Donne (!), Byron, , Evelyn Waugh, Hemingway and Fitzgerald, Dorothy Parker and Robert Benchley, , Edmund Wilson, Thomas Wolfe, Hart Crane, Malcolm Lowry, , John O’Hara, Kingsley Amis. And, of course, Dylan Thomas, who once defined an alcoholic as “someone you don’t like who drinks as much as you do.” Holland has a light, winsome touch and is always funny. Here she is on making a martini: he “poured the gin into a pitcher and then nodded ritually at the bottle of vermouth across the room.” She tells us that even the National Institutes of Health admits that what it calls “alcohol readministration” alleviates the symptoms of both alcohol withdrawal and hangovers, and notes that “ ‘readministraton’ seems to mean hair of the dog.” She quotes the Puritan minister Increase Mather — “Drink is in itself a good Creature of God, and to be received with thankfulness, but the abuse of drink is from Satan, the wine is from God, but the Drunkard is from the Devil” — and declares his words “an early version of our incessant ‘moderation’ sermons, with only a pint or two dividing heaven from hell.” s much as Holland enjoys romping down London’s Gin Lane and through America’s Jazz Age and Prohibition, she can’t abide our current era of moderation. Hip urbanites, she writes, “turned drinking in moderation into a high-class avocation.” Wine tours caught on and microbreweries arrived. The devotees “aren’t drinkers. They’re connoisseurs and critics, priests of ritual, sniffers and tasters, discerning scholars scowling thoughtfully into their glass. Fun has nothing to do with it. ... In the metropolitan haunts of the highly sophisticated, the cocktail is no longer an instrument of friendship but a competitive fashion statement, or one-upmanship.” Before vodka, which is pretty much tasteless, “hit our shores,” she says, “much of what you put in your drink had a flavor of its own. Who put chocolate syrup in their rum or produced lemon-flavored Scotch?” Then distillers started flavoring vodka with fruit — oranges, apples, raspberries, blueberries — and hip urbanites lapped it up. Now some of the emperor’s children among us are inhaling it. Holland, who lives in Virginia’s Blue Ridge Mountains, certainly doesn’t end with recipes for foo-foo drinks. She provides hints on making your own spirits, like applejack and elderberry wine, and instructions for building, yes, a still. Glancing at the diagram, I’d advise being sober if you try. Robert R. Harris is the deputy editor of the Book Review. POUR; Settling In, Glass In Hand, To Read Of Wine SHAKEN AND STIRRED; The House of Muse Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Movie Review | '28 Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/books/index.html Books - Review Reviewed by JANET MASLIN “Animal, Vegetable, Miracle” is a wonderfully neighborly account of stunt eating. Reviewed by WILLIAM GRIMES Lynne Olson’s book is a spirited, propulsive work about Neville Chamberlain’s downfall and Winston Churchill’s installation as British prime minister. Three Writers of Nonfiction Are Honored Robert Whitaker was among this year’s winners of the Lukas Prize Project Awards, which recognize excellence in nonfiction writing. Books of The Times Reviewed by MICHIKO KAKUTANI In “Falling Man,” Don DeLillo examines 9/11 and its aftermath as experienced by a self-absorbed couple. her new book on the American wedding industry, Rebecca Mead speaks on the garish events that weddings have become, and what it tells us about ourselves. Classic Book About America’s Indians Gains a Few Flourishes as a Film To broaden appeal for a television version of “Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee,” the 1971 classic by Dee Brown, HBO rearranged people and facts. Author and Surfer to Share in Proceeds of Waves Book Susan Casey is hiring Laird Hamilton, one of best known celebrity surfers, to help her write about the science of giant waves. Reviewed by MICHIKO KAKUTANI Richard Flanagan’s stunning new novel gives us a world headed toward irredeemable disaster. 'The Joy of Drinking' Reviewed by ROBERT R. HARRIS A history of our long love affair with drinking. By ALLAN M. BRANDT Reviewed by JONATHAN MILES The rise and fall of the cigarette in American culture. 'Send: The Essential Guide to Email for Office and Home' By DAVID SHIPLEY AND WILL SCHWALBE Reviewed by DAVE BARRY There are a lot of ways you can go very, very wrong with your e-mail. 'Teenage: The Creation of Youth Culture' Reviewed by CAMILLE PAGLIA How adolescence was invented, starting in the 19th century. Reviewed by BENJAMIN KUNKEL Nirvana’s power owed a lot to its self-divisions: tortured lyrics, catchy tunes. Reviewed by TONI BENTLEY Steve Geng’s memoir of addiction is also an elegy to his sister, a writer for The New Yorker who died in 1997. 'Bigger Deal: A Year on the New Poker Circuit' Reviewed by SUSAN CASEY Since Anthony Holden first wrote about pro poker a decade ago, the game has exploded. 'Later, at the Bar: A Novel in Stories' Reviewed by DANIELLE TRUSSONI A novel in stories concerns an upstate tavern and its regulars. ‘The Joy of Drinking’ “William Faulkner, who knew a thing or two about it, observed that civilization begins with fermentation.” By DAVID SHIPLEY and WILL SCHWALBE “So what is it about email? Why do we send so many electronic messages that we never should have written?” ‘Bigger Deal: A Year Inside the Poker Boom’ “The 2006 prize pool of more than $150 million made the thirty-seventh World Series of Poker . . . the biggest sporting event in the history of the planet.” Dr. Atkins' Diet Revolution told people they could eat all the fatty foods they wanted as long as they kept a tight rein on their carbohydrates. ” Correction: Caption in ‘The Grand Surprise’ Review from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 'The Yiddish Policemen’s Union,' This week: Robert R. Harris, the deputy editor of the Book Review, on “The Joy of Drinking,” David Shipley, the co-author of “Send”; and Jon Savage, Dwight Garner, senior editor, is the host. This Week's Book Review Podcast ( Why Not the Worst? Bad books are an essential weapon in the struggle against the tyranny of good taste. Reviewed by MARILYN STASIO In Mark Mills’s second historical mystery, a young British scholar unearths the sad, shocking secrets of a Renaissance garden. The Funny Pages | Sunday Serial ‘Gentlemen of the Road’ This week, the conclusion: On following the road to one’s destiny, with the usual intrusions of violence and grace. The 10 Best Books of 2006 100 Notable Books of 2006 Best American Fiction Survey Nobel Prize in Literature Book Review Editor Responds Sign Up for the Books Update Receive a selective overview of new book reviews and features every Sunday. SEARCH BOOK REVIEWS SINCE 1981: MOST POPULAR - BOOKS Because It&#8217;s Good for You, That&#8217;s Why In Churchill&#8217;s Rise to Power, a Rough Path of Rebellion Essay: Why Not the Worst? Three Writers of Nonfiction Are Honored A Prince of Pulp, Legit at Last Author and Surfer to Share in Proceeds of Waves Book Not Ready for Print? You Can Whip Up an Audiobook for a Podcast for Now Not the Worst? The Young and the Restless complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Summit of Pike's Peak, 1901 What’s new on Broadway? Continuous coverage of business news. Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. Photos, fine art, books and more. Looking to buy a new car?
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Harris.t.html The Joy of Drinking - Barbara Holland ROBERT R. HARRIS Published: May 6, 2007 It’s odd the books people get asked to review. Take this one, a carefree history of our long love affair with drinking. I have no training as a historian, just some slight experience on both sides of bars. And perhaps an exaggerated reputation for disparaging today’s ubiquitous alcohol-free business lunches. Barbara Holland, though, might empathize. She reminds us that in 1787, two days before their work was done, the 55 delegates to the Constitutional Convention “adjourned to a tavern for some rest, and according to the bill they drank 54 bottles of Madeira, 60 bottles of claret, 8 of whiskey, 22 of port, 8 of hard cider and 7 bowls of punch so large that, it was said, ducks could swim around in them. Then they went back to work and finished founding the new Republic.” Note the 55 delegates and 54 bottles of Madeira. Which founder was slacking? JOY OF DRINKING 150 pp. Bloomsbury. $14.95. First Chapter: ‘The Joy of Drinking’ But “The Joy of Drinking” begins way before “our Revolution was born and raised in taverns.” It goes back some 10,000 years to when society, or what there was of it, went agricultural. Crops got planted and harvested, and some rotted and fermented, forming a liquid you could drink. The party began. Holland cites Faulkner as observing that civilization began with fermentation, and he’d have known. Drink, she writes, became “the social glue of the human race. Probably in the beginning we could explain ourselves to our close family members with grunts, muttered syllables, gestures, slaps and punches. Then when the neighbors started dropping in to help harvest, stomp, stir and drink the bounty of the land, after we’d softened our natural suspicious hostility with a few stiff ones, we had to think up some more nuanced communication, like words. From there it was a short step to grammar, civil law, religion, history and ‘The Whiffenpoof Song.’ ” And she sketches the evolution of this process around the globe: in China, India, Africa, the Islamic world (!), Europe and the Americas, though her reliance on Marco Polo as a source may raise an actual historian’s eyebrows. Beer was always big, and may even be healthy. The American Journal of Clinical Nutrition, Holland writes, “claims that a moderate beer drinker — whatever that means — swallows 11 percent of his dietary protein needs, 12 percent of the carbohydrates, 9 percent of essential phosphorus, 7 percent of his riboflavin, and 5 percent of niacin. Should he go on to immoderate beer drinking, he becomes a walking vitamin pill.” That last is an assertion upon which any given issue of Science Times will be sure to pounce. Still, I’ll take it, having long since abandoned hope of someone coming up with any health benefits of smoking. Holland slowly savors what E. B. White called, in that genteel New Yorker way, “the golden companionship of the tavern.” She notes that “in a proper pub everyone there is potentially, if not a lifelong friend, at least someone to lure into an argument about foreign policy or,” God help us all, “the Red Sox.” And she knows that “to extract the fullest flavor of our drinking house, we needed to spend serious evening time there, slowly coming to know the bartender and the regulars, their joys and sorrows.” But becoming a “regular” isn’t as easy as “Cheers” may have made it seem; a decent bar’s culture is tough to crack. Coffeehouses, it must be admitted, have often vied with bars for our affections. In Shakespeare’s day, Holland writes, “coffeehouses sprang up to challenge the taverns. The authorities were suspicious of the whole thing and sent spies to eavesdrop. In the taverns all was amiable and easy, but the coffeehouses were cauldrons of edgy malcontents.” Throw in some iPods and wired soccer moms and you could be at Starbucks. Holland traces the origin of the toast and of settling lawsuits “out of court” (in colonial America taverns were built next to courthouses, and opposing parties would go next door to talk things over). She describes the mechanics of hangovers and their cures and elaborates on the ceremony of mixing martinis. James Bond, she argues, was “the wave of the future, the drinker not as merrymaker,” personified by Nick and Nora Charles of “Thin Man” fame, but the drinker “as expert, authority, specialist.” And as you might guess, Holland, who has written a dozen or so previous books, has done impressive research on a subject dear to some of us — writers who drink. Mentioned are Johnson and Boswell, John Donne (!), Byron, , Evelyn Waugh, Hemingway and Fitzgerald, Dorothy Parker and Robert Benchley, , Edmund Wilson, Thomas Wolfe, Hart Crane, Malcolm Lowry, , John O’Hara, Kingsley Amis. And, of course, Dylan Thomas, who once defined an alcoholic as “someone you don’t like who drinks as much as you do.” Holland has a light, winsome touch and is always funny. Here she is on making a martini: he “poured the gin into a pitcher and then nodded ritually at the bottle of vermouth across the room.” She tells us that even the National Institutes of Health admits that what it calls “alcohol readministration” alleviates the symptoms of both alcohol withdrawal and hangovers, and notes that “ ‘readministraton’ seems to mean hair of the dog.” She quotes the Puritan minister Increase Mather — “Drink is in itself a good Creature of God, and to be received with thankfulness, but the abuse of drink is from Satan, the wine is from God, but the Drunkard is from the Devil” — and declares his words “an early version of our incessant ‘moderation’ sermons, with only a pint or two dividing heaven from hell.” s much as Holland enjoys romping down London’s Gin Lane and through America’s Jazz Age and Prohibition, she can’t abide our current era of moderation. Hip urbanites, she writes, “turned drinking in moderation into a high-class avocation.” Wine tours caught on and microbreweries arrived. The devotees “aren’t drinkers. They’re connoisseurs and critics, priests of ritual, sniffers and tasters, discerning scholars scowling thoughtfully into their glass. Fun has nothing to do with it. ... In the metropolitan haunts of the highly sophisticated, the cocktail is no longer an instrument of friendship but a competitive fashion statement, or one-upmanship.” Before vodka, which is pretty much tasteless, “hit our shores,” she says, “much of what you put in your drink had a flavor of its own. Who put chocolate syrup in their rum or produced lemon-flavored Scotch?” Then distillers started flavoring vodka with fruit — oranges, apples, raspberries, blueberries — and hip urbanites lapped it up. Now some of the emperor’s children among us are inhaling it. Holland, who lives in Virginia’s Blue Ridge Mountains, certainly doesn’t end with recipes for foo-foo drinks. She provides hints on making your own spirits, like applejack and elderberry wine, and instructions for building, yes, a still. Glancing at the diagram, I’d advise being sober if you try. Robert R. Harris is the deputy editor of the Book Review. POUR; Settling In, Glass In Hand, To Read Of Wine SHAKEN AND STIRRED; The House of Muse complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer THE NORTH POLE WAS HERE Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/books/index.html?partner=rssnyt Books - Review Reviewed by JANET MASLIN “Animal, Vegetable, Miracle” is a wonderfully neighborly account of stunt eating. Reviewed by WILLIAM GRIMES Lynne Olson’s book is a spirited, propulsive work about Neville Chamberlain’s downfall and Winston Churchill’s installation as British prime minister. Three Writers of Nonfiction Are Honored Robert Whitaker was among this year’s winners of the Lukas Prize Project Awards, which recognize excellence in nonfiction writing. Books of The Times Reviewed by MICHIKO KAKUTANI In “Falling Man,” Don DeLillo examines 9/11 and its aftermath as experienced by a self-absorbed couple. her new book on the American wedding industry, Rebecca Mead speaks on the garish events that weddings have become, and what it tells us about ourselves. Classic Book About America’s Indians Gains a Few Flourishes as a Film To broaden appeal for a television version of “Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee,” the 1971 classic by Dee Brown, HBO rearranged people and facts. Author and Surfer to Share in Proceeds of Waves Book Susan Casey is hiring Laird Hamilton, one of best known celebrity surfers, to help her write about the science of giant waves. Reviewed by MICHIKO KAKUTANI Richard Flanagan’s stunning new novel gives us a world headed toward irredeemable disaster. 'The Joy of Drinking' Reviewed by ROBERT R. HARRIS A history of our long love affair with drinking. By ALLAN M. BRANDT Reviewed by JONATHAN MILES The rise and fall of the cigarette in American culture. 'Send: The Essential Guide to Email for Office and Home' By DAVID SHIPLEY AND WILL SCHWALBE Reviewed by DAVE BARRY There are a lot of ways you can go very, very wrong with your e-mail. 'Teenage: The Creation of Youth Culture' Reviewed by CAMILLE PAGLIA How adolescence was invented, starting in the 19th century. Reviewed by BENJAMIN KUNKEL Nirvana’s power owed a lot to its self-divisions: tortured lyrics, catchy tunes. Reviewed by TONI BENTLEY Steve Geng’s memoir of addiction is also an elegy to his sister, a writer for The New Yorker who died in 1997. 'Bigger Deal: A Year on the New Poker Circuit' Reviewed by SUSAN CASEY Since Anthony Holden first wrote about pro poker a decade ago, the game has exploded. 'Later, at the Bar: A Novel in Stories' Reviewed by DANIELLE TRUSSONI A novel in stories concerns an upstate tavern and its regulars. ‘The Joy of Drinking’ “William Faulkner, who knew a thing or two about it, observed that civilization begins with fermentation.” By DAVID SHIPLEY and WILL SCHWALBE “So what is it about email? Why do we send so many electronic messages that we never should have written?” ‘Bigger Deal: A Year Inside the Poker Boom’ “The 2006 prize pool of more than $150 million made the thirty-seventh World Series of Poker . . . the biggest sporting event in the history of the planet.” Dr. Atkins' Diet Revolution told people they could eat all the fatty foods they wanted as long as they kept a tight rein on their carbohydrates. ” Correction: Caption in ‘The Grand Surprise’ Review from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 'The Yiddish Policemen’s Union,' This week: Robert R. Harris, the deputy editor of the Book Review, on “The Joy of Drinking,” David Shipley, the co-author of “Send”; and Jon Savage, Dwight Garner, senior editor, is the host. This Week's Book Review Podcast ( Why Not the Worst? Bad books are an essential weapon in the struggle against the tyranny of good taste. Reviewed by MARILYN STASIO In Mark Mills’s second historical mystery, a young British scholar unearths the sad, shocking secrets of a Renaissance garden. The Funny Pages | Sunday Serial ‘Gentlemen of the Road’ This week, the conclusion: On following the road to one’s destiny, with the usual intrusions of violence and grace. The 10 Best Books of 2006 100 Notable Books of 2006 Best American Fiction Survey Nobel Prize in Literature Book Review Editor Responds Sign Up for the Books Update Receive a selective overview of new book reviews and features every Sunday. SEARCH BOOK REVIEWS SINCE 1981: MOST POPULAR - BOOKS Because It&#8217;s Good for You, That&#8217;s Why In Churchill&#8217;s Rise to Power, a Rough Path of Rebellion Essay: Why Not the Worst? Three Writers of Nonfiction Are Honored A Prince of Pulp, Legit at Last Author and Surfer to Share in Proceeds of Waves Book Not Ready for Print? You Can Whip Up an Audiobook for a Podcast for Now Not the Worst? The Young and the Restless complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Louisiana Heron, Plate 217 Get the latest business news Plan what to see, eat and do. Post a job online today! Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. Photos, fine art, books and more.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Barry.t.html Send: The Essential Guide to Email for Office and Home - David Shipley and Will Schwalbe 2007 A few years back, when my son was in college, he had to mail a letter. I don’t remember the specific reason, but I do remember having a conversation with him in which he complained bitterly about the amount of work involved — finding a place where he could purchase a stamp, figuring out what kind of stamp he needed, actually writing the letter, locating an envelope, putting the letter into the envelope, having to physically leave his dormitory room to mail the envelope and so on. I grew exhausted just listening to him describe this series of arduous tasks, one coming right after another. I was glad, for my son’s sake, that he never had to live in a world — as I once did — where the only way to change channels was to walk all the way to the TV set and manually turn a knob. Essential Guide to Email for Office and Home. By David Shipley and Will Schwalbe. 247 pp. Alfred A. Knopf. $19.95. Unlike my son, I did not grow up with e-mail and texting, but I have come to agree with him: electronic communication is superior to the old-fashioned paper kind. I do almost all of my communicating by e-mail. I’ve been known to e-mail people who were literally standing next to me, which I know sounds crazy, because at that distance I could easily call them on my cellphone. But I prefer e-mail, because it’s such an effective way of getting information to somebody without running the risk of becoming involved in human conversation. I’ve become so dependent on e-mail that I sometimes wonder how we ever got by without it. Imagine, for example, how useful it would have been for Paul Revere. Instead of having to climb onto a horse in the middle of the night and ride through Massachusetts spreading the alarm, he could have simply whipped out his , fired off a quick message to the patriots in Lexington and Concord, then gone to sleep (unless he also had TiVo). Of course there might have been problems. Since Revere was typing with his thumbs, his e-mail probably would have said something like, “teh nritish are cming.” As a result the recipients might not have grasped the urgency of the message. The Concord patriots might have assumed it was mainly intended for the Lexington patriots, while Lexington might have assumed Concord was going to handle it, and we would still be British subjects today. I’m not saying that would be a bad thing; I’m just saying it was not what Revere meant to accomplish. E-mail, for all its efficiency, often fails to achieve its intended result; a vague or carelessly worded message can cause major problems — personal, legal and financial — for senders and receivers. Helping you avoid these problems is the goal of “Send,” an informative, entertaining, thorough and thoughtful book. The authors are media veterans — David Shipley is deputy editorial page editor of Will Schwalbe is editor in chief of Hyperion Books — with extensive, and not always positive, experience sending and receiving e-mail. They summarize their essential message in two rules: “Think before you send” and “Send e-mail you would like to receive.” These rules may seem obvious, but both are deceptively easy to break in our rapid-fire, multitasking world. Many of us, especially if we have handheld e-mail devices, routinely process e-mail while engaging in other activities such as walking, talking, eating and even (you know who you are) driving. I am not proud of this, but I have processed e-mail while accompanying my 6-year-old daughter on the “Small World” ride at World. These are not ideal conditions for thoughtfulness. It’s impossible to concentrate fully on your e-mail when you’re distracted, especially by animated dolls shrieking about international understanding. You’re going to get careless; you’re going to make mistakes in both content and tone. And there are many, many mistakes to be made. In “Send,” Shipley and Schwalbe describe in detail the alarming array of ways you can botch e-mail even before you start writing the message. These include using a misleading or meaningless subject (“Re: Re: Re:”); addressing the e-mail to the wrong recipients, or too many of them; putting somebody in the “To” list who should be a “Cc” or vice versa; and misusing the sneaky “Bcc” and “Forward” commands, which can easily cause a confidential message to become very public indeed. The authors also touch on a pet peeve of mine: people who abuse the “Reply All” command. Perhaps you are one of them. You receive a message addressed to many recipients — often a much-recycled joke, story, list, urban myth, etc. There are millions of these floating around; many of us simply delete them unread. But you, the “Reply All” abuser, read it and decide to respond with some clever comment of your own (such as “LOL”). And instead of hitting “Reply,” which would inflict your reply only on the sender, you hit “Reply All,” thereby forcing everybody on the recipient list to receive, and delete, yet another useless piece of e-mail. Please do not take this personally, “Reply All” people, but: everybody hates you. We hate you almost as much as we hate the people who mass-mail this Internet sludge in the first place. Dave Barry's most recent book is “Dave Barry’s Money Secrets, Like: Why Is There a Giant Eyeball on the Dollar?” 6th ANNUAL YEAR IN IDEAS; Literary Spam THE FUNNY PAGES: III: SUNDAY SERIAL; The Outlook: Chapter 4: A Threatening Message ESSAY; Literary Letters, Lost In Cyberspace complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Obey The Law, 1948 Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/06/books/review/Paglia.t.html Teenage: The Creation of Youth Culture - Jon Savage Young and the Restless Fans wait for a glimpse of Frank Sinatra, Los Angeles, 1944. 2007 When did teenage angst and arrogance begin? Many baby boomers, still fighting over the legacy of the 1960s as they lurch toward retirement, think of themselves as products of the rock ’n’ roll rebellion that shattered the bourgeois proprieties of the 1950s. Chronicled in song and witnessed by the new electronic media, the impudent saga of the ’60s counterculture seemed unique. Creation of Youth Culture. Illustrated. 549 pp. Viking. $29.95. Jon Savage’s massive new book, “Teenage: The Creation of Youth Culture,” provides the prequel. There has in fact been wave after wave of youthful defiance — Savage begins his study in the 19th century — whether idealistic or hedonistic or both. The author of “England’s Dreaming: Anarchy, Sex Pistols, Punk Rock and Beyond,” Savage seems more at home with popular culture than with the fine arts. Hence the material in “Teenage” on ragtime, swing and the movies is stronger than that on modernist painters and poets. Savage traces his interest in generational insurrection to his childhood in the tranquil London suburbs of the 1950s and ’60s. His father was a World War II veteran, and the legacy of that war was still visible in the bombed-out districts of England’s major cities. Savage feels that the “unresolved horror” of the war period “informed the extreme manifestations of youth culture” in which he “thoroughly immersed” himself during the 1960s and ’70s. “Teenage” takes a while to hit its stride. The first chapter awkwardly interweaves the journal of Marie Bashkirtseff (a Russian-born painter who died of tuberculosis at the age of 25 in Paris in 1884) with the grisly crimes of a 15-year-old serial child murderer, Jesse Pomeroy, who was jailed in 1874 in Massachusetts. This strained pairing, with its manufactured shock, was all too typical of pretentious academic books in postmodernist cultural studies in the late 1980s and ’90s. Worse, the chapter ends with a whiplash-inducing jump backward to the late 18th century of Rousseau and Goethe — the crucible of youth-powered Romanticism that should have been front and center at the start. Given this book’s sympathy to every modern glimmer of homosexuality, it is strange that there is no discussion of the ancient Greeks’ glorification of youth, which was revived by Italian Renaissance artists like Donatello and Michelangelo. But once it gets going, “Teenage” becomes compulsive reading. Savage parallels the “militarist vision for youth” promoted by newly industrial and aggressively nationalist Germany in the 1870s and ’80s to the “cult of masculinity” and bullying suppression of individuality embodied in team sports in elite British schools, which shaped boys for imperial service. Savage amusingly juxtaposes the earnest social prototype of the “muscular Christian” with the capricious iconoclasm of Arthur Rimbaud and . Missing, however, is the Romantic lineage of these writers in Théophile Gautier and other aesthetes : not everything in literature should be interpreted as a direct response to current events or social conditions. The portrait of Wilde is distorted in treating him only as a decadent and an oppressed gay outcast. Wilde’s success as a writer of stage comedies, as well as a bon vivant who catered to the elite, is ignored. Furthermore, when Savage says that “Wilde’s influence over the young was a central issue” at his two trials and that he was accused of “sodomy with 12 youths,” the running theme of social class is oddly erased. Wilde’s violation of class borders in consorting with grooms, valets and coachmen was a major point raised against him in court — and one he did not honestly answer. Savage’s account of the “Apaches” — criminal bands of “inner urban savages” — of early-20th-century Paris is fascinating, but in rightly calling them “essentially a media creation” he neglects to trace their popular lineage. Apache dancing — a fierce psychodrama of sex war — would be introduced to film by Rudolph Valentino and would linger as an erotic trope well into the Beat era, as can be seen in Audrey Hepburn’s brilliant feminist parody of it in a Parisian nightclub in “Funny Face.” Whether L. Frank Baum’s “Wonderful Wizard of Oz,” published in 1900, should be classified as an artifact of youth culture seems questionable. Savage is on firm ground when he links Baum’s Emerald City to the White City of the World’s Columbian Exposition. But tornado-tossed Dorothy belongs to an earlier fairy-tale tradition of the questing girl-child, revived in Lewis Carroll’s spunky Alice. Camille Paglia is the university professor of humanities and media studies at the University of the Arts in Philadelphia. She is the author, most recently, of “Break, Blow, Burn.” Conditions and Trends complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: CLASSICAL MUSIC Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Kantor-t.html One Perfect Day: The Selling of the American Wedding - Rebecca Mead 2007 The late, great writer Marjorie Williams once confessed that reading “Fast Food Nation,” Eric Schlosser’s investigation into the fast-food industry, left her craving a Burger King fix. I had a similar reaction to “One Perfect Day,” Rebecca Mead’s dour tour of the American wedding business, which made me suddenly long for a frilly Saturday night nuptial blowout. Selling of the American Wedding. 245 pp. The Penguin Press. $25.95. wait. I already had one, four years ago. The whole thing turned out pretty great — but not according to Mead. For her, the American wedding is an exercise in cheap sentiment and pricey self-indulgence, orchestrated by an industry that cunningly plays on the romantic delusions of the betrothed. She has the darkest possible view of its preparatory rituals: by flipping dreamily through Modern Bride and Weddings, a bride is trying to create a new self “whose skin always glows with happiness, whose life is one of such grace that the fine china will always be in use.” Registering — for water glasses, an ice-cream maker, the usual tchotchkes — is an exercise in “licensed covetousness.” By her analysis, the betrothed throw themselves into wedding planning because they know married life will ultimately be a letdown. , Rebecca — come over some night for homemade ice cream and see! Though she speaks of the entire wedding industry, Mead actually doesn’t seem interested in celebrations like mine — which was on the tasteful side, if I do say so myself. Mead is so outraged by the gilded picture presented by bridal magazines that she overcorrects and gives us a book full of tawdry, tacky affairs, where the dresses are ill-fitting, the officiant is a hired gun and the couple flushes away more than they can afford. These weddings take place mostly in Las Vegas, at Disney World, on an overcrowded stretch of beach in Aruba or in Gatlinburg, Tenn., home to kitschy wedding chapels and a round-the-clock “marry-thon.” In other words, Mead has reduced the American wedding to its cheesiest and most venal elements, and then written a book about how cheesy and venal American weddings are. But even that book would have been much better if Mead had quoted more than a handful of brides. She’s a gifted writer, mostly for The New Yorker, and she’s written well about romance in the past. “One Perfect Day” has a scattering of vibrant characters — the wedding planner who recreates the imperial-Russia-themed nuptials of Joan Rivers’s daughter Melissa on a $200 budget, the ones who entertain themselves at an industry conference by whacking at a Bridezilla piñata. But almost none of them are brides. Inexplicably, the book is almost entirely devoid of them. (Don’t even ask about grooms.) Like a tourist observing wildlife, Mead tracks and observes brides — like one trying on a dress in a David’s Bridal store — but instead of interviewing them, just stares and assigns them thoughts. The main bridal character in the book is a kind of imagined one, wearing a “gown in which she can barely move” and a “veil behind which her smile, white teeth bleached to a photogenic whiteness, is temporarily concealed.” The book’s pages practically curl from this sort of disdain. The courthouse in Las Vegas where wedding licenses are handed out is “one of the most insalubrious places I have ever spent time,” Mead sniffs, as if she were expecting an edifying experience. Of course, Mead is right about her book’s broadest point: yes, sure, lots of American weddings are overblown confections; and O.K., that probably tells us something about ourselves. But Mead rushes away from her most incisive thoughts — about the way wedding photos, propped up on office and living-room walls, serve as a kind of advertising campaign for the marriage in question, about how weddings became splashier and more expensive just as no-fault divorce made marriage a less secure proposition than ever before. Besides, the excess of the modern American wedding is precisely what makes it such crazy, memorable fun. In a decade of frequent wedding-going, I have been to one where entire lobes of foie gras were sliced and sautéed to order for guests, another where a dessert table was loaded with more than a thousand cookies home-baked by the bride’s family, and another where an entertainer wearing a giant plastic John Travolta head entered the dance floor to the strains of “Saturday Night Fever.” Was each one of these touches overkill? If you insist. Was each one delightful? You bet. Perhaps this is why, as a glance at this newspaper’s Vows column will attest, even blue-blooded weddings are now as Trump-like as everyone else’s. Today, even the preppiest country-club bride is likely to write her own goofy vows, wear a $5,000 gown with an immodest neckline and treat herself to a little Botox before the big event. We’re all nouveau riche now. The rise of the big, luxe wedding isn’t ultimately that different from the rise of the big, luxe television; the big, luxe handbag; or other fashionable, unnecessary supersize treats. The difference is that weddings, unlike most other things we purchase, reliably deliver heart-stopping measures of joy. Do grandmothers cry just as hard when a bride is married, as Mead was, at a courthouse while wearing office clothes? Perhaps. But most of us would rather be out under a tent, enjoying Champagne, slow dances and the company of a plastic John Travolta. Jodi Kantor is a reporter at The Times. for as low as $2.99 a week — that’s 50% off. Talk; Questionable Letter For a Liar's Memoir new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics Feeding the Hippo at the Bronx Zoo, 1947 N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Kinsley-t.html?ex=1336708800&en=e7b693e82748de2f&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything - Christopher Hitchens 2007 Observers of the Christopher Hitchens phenomenon have been expecting a book about religion from him around now. But this impressive and enjoyable attack on everything so many people hold dear is not the book we were expecting. IS NOT GREAT How Religion Poisons Everything. 307 pp. Twelve/Warner Books. $24.99. ‘God Is Not Great’ Mark Mahaney for in London 30 or more years ago, then in New York and for the last couple of decades in Washington, Hitchens has established himself as a character. This character draws on such familiar sources as the novels of P. G. Wodehouse, Evelyn Waugh and ; the leftist politics of the 1960s (British variant); and — of course — the person of George Orwell. (Others might throw in the flower-clutching Bunthorne from Gilbert and Sullivan’s “Patience,” but that is probably not an intentional influence.) Hitchens is the bohemian and the swell, the dashing foreign correspondent, the painstaking literary critic and the intellectual engagé. He charms Washington hostesses but will set off a stink bomb in the salon if the opportunity arises. His conversation sparkles, not quite effortlessly, and if he is a bit too quick to resort to French in search of le mot juste, his jewels of erudition, though flashy, are real. Or at least they fool me. Hitchens was right to choose Washington over New York and London. His enemies would like to believe he is a fraud. But he isn’t, as the very existence of his many enemies tends to prove. He is self-styled, to be sure, but no more so than many others in Washington — or even in New York or London — who are not nearly as good at it. He is a principled dissolute, with the courage of his dissolution: he enjoys smoking and drinking, and not just the reputation for smoking and drinking — although he enjoys that too. And through it all he is productive to an extent that seems like cheating: 23 books, pamphlets, collections and collaborations so far; a long and often heavily researched column every month in Vanity Fair; frequent fusillades in Slate and elsewhere; and speeches, debates and other public spectacles whenever offered. The big strategic challenge for a career like this is to remain interesting, and the easiest tactic for doing that is surprise. If they expect you to say X, you say minus X. Consistency is foolish, as the man said. (Didn’t he?) Under the unwritten and somewhat eccentric rules of American public discourse, a statement that contradicts everything you have ever said before is considered for that reason to be especially sincere, courageous and dependable. At The New Republic in the 1980s, when I was the editor, we used to joke about changing our name to “Even the Liberal New Republic,” because that was how we were referred to whenever we took a conservative position on something, which was often. Then came the day when we took a liberal position on something and we were referred to as “Even the Conservative New Republic.” As this example illustrates, among writers about politics, the surprise technique usually means starting left and turning right. Trouble is, you do this once and what’s your next party trick? Christopher Hitchens had seemed to be solving this problem by turning his conversion into an ideological “Dance of the Seven Veils.” Long ago he came out against abortion. Interesting! Then he discovered and made quite a kosher meal of the fact that his mother, deceased, was Jewish, which under Jewish law meant he himself was Jewish. Interesting!! (He was notorious at the time for his anti-Zionist sympathies.) In the 1990s, Hitchens was virulently, and somewhat inexplicably, hostile to President . Interesting!!! You would have thought that Clinton’s decadence — the thing that bothered other liberals and leftists the most — would have positively appealed to Hitchens. Finally and recently, he became the most (possibly the only) intellectually serious non-neocon supporter of ’s Iraq war. Interesting!!!! Where was this train heading? Possibly toward an open conversion to mainline conservatism and quick descent into cliché and demagoguery (the path chosen by Paul Johnson, a somewhat similar British character of the previous generation). But surely there was time for a few more intellectual adventures before retiring to an office at the Hoover Institution or some other nursing home of the mind. One obvious possibility stood out: Hitchens, known to be a fervid atheist, would find God and take up religion. The only question was which flavor he would choose. Embrace Islam? Too cute. Complete the half-finished Jewish script? Become a Catholic, following the path well trodden by such British writers as Waugh and Greene? Or — most daring and original — would he embrace the old Church of England (Episcopalianism in America) and spend his declining years writing about the beauty of the hymns, the essential Britishness of village churchyards, the importance of protecting religion from the dangers of excessive faith, and so on? Well, ladies and gentlemen, Hitchens is either playing the contrarian at a very high level or possibly he is even sincere. But just as he had us expecting minus X, he confounds us by reverting to X. He has written, with tremendous brio and great wit, but also with an underlying genuine anger, an all-out attack on all aspects of religion. Sometimes, instead of the word “religion,” he refers to it as “god-worship,” which, although virtually a tautology (isn’t “object of worship” almost a definition of a god?), makes the practice sound sinister and strange. Michael Kinsley is a columnist for Time magazine. Cheers For Jefferson Of Bellow and Baghdad The Independent of London THE CLOSE READER; What Would Orwell Do? Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Lawrence-t.html Nixon and Kissinger: Partners in Power - Robert Dallek MARK ATWOOD LAWRENCE Published: May 13, 2007 Visionaries or cynics? Peacemakers or warmongers? Few individuals in recent times have provoked as much controversy as and his partner in foreign affairs, . Admirers laud the two men for dramatically easing the cold war and sensibly recognizing the limits of American power to shape the world. Critics castigate them as Machiavellians who undertook reckless policies in the third world, often throwing American power behind brutal tyrants in elusive quests for international stability. 740 pp. HarperCollins Publishers. $32.50. Robert Dallek argues for another possibility: the two men were visionaries and cynics at the same time. On first consideration, this is an unremarkable conclusion. And yet “Nixon and Kissinger: Partners in Power” makes a valuable contribution to the study of American policy making during the turbulent years from 1969 through 1974. Partly, it does this by transcending the stale polemics that have surrounded the study of Nixon and Kissinger. But its more significant, if not wholly convincing, achievement is to connect the unevenness of their policy-making performance with the ups and downs of their peculiar personalities. “The careers of both Nixon and Kissinger,” Dallek asserts, “reflect the extent to which great accomplishments and public wrongdoing can spring from inner lives.” This isn’t the first time Dallek, a prolific biographer of American presidents, has challenged simplistic characterizations of public men by delving into their private behavior. In 2003, his best-selling study, “An Unfinished Life: , 1917-1963,” drew on long-secret medical records to describe Kennedy’s epic struggles against a variety of ailments. “Nixon and Kissinger” contains no such spectacular revelations. Indeed, Dallek’s extensive use of recently declassified material — millions of pages of national security documents, 2,800 hours of Nixon’s secret tape recordings and 20,000 pages of transcriptions of Kissinger’s phone calls — seems to have turned up nothing to revise the broad contours of either man’s life. Rather, Dallek exploits this new material mainly for the quotations and fresh details that enable him to paint rich portraits of his two subjects. Superficially, Nixon and Kissinger, who served first as Nixon’s national security adviser and then as his secretary of state, had precious little in common. The president, son of a California grocer, identified with the hopes and grievances of middle America and bristled with resentment against East Coast sophisticates. Kissinger, a German-born Jew, rose to prominence as a pathbreaking scholar of international politics at Harvard and reveled in his acceptance among the political and intellectual elite. But fundamentally, Dallek shows, the two were remarkably alike. Both wanted desperately to leave a deep imprint on history. Both were ruthless pragmatists who disregarded decorum, principle and sometimes the law to get what they wanted. And both were insecure loners who distrusted, deceived and abused just about everyone, including each other. For these troubled men, Dallek writes, politics offered “a form of vocational therapy” — an arena where they could exercise control and find approval. Shared neuroses led to jealousy and hostility. Kissinger privately assailed Nixon as “that madman” and “the meatball mind.” Nixon returned the favor, demeaning Kissinger as his “Jew boy” and calling him “psychopathic.” He fretted incessantly that Kissinger was getting too much credit for the administration’s accomplishments and repeatedly considered firing him. Still, Dallek writes, their common characteristics did even more to bond the two men, who formed “one of or possibly the most significant White House collaboration in U.S. history.” Under some circumstances, Dallek suggests, their blend of ideological flexibility and monumental egotism produced bold foreign policy advances, most notably the opening of relations with Communist China in 1971-72. And he praises Nixon and Kissinger even more exuberantly for initiating détente with the Soviet Union. Agreements negotiated with Moscow, he argues, helped end the cold war by lowering Soviet hostility to the outside world and opening the country to Western influences, which ate away at Communist rule from the inside. Kissinger’s efforts to make peace in the Middle East after the 1973 Arab-Israeli war similarly laid the groundwork for a later breakthrough, in this case the landmark 1978 accord between Egypt and Israel. Mark Atwood Lawrence teaches history at the University of Texas at Austin. He is the Burden: Europe and the American Commitment to War in Vietnam.” The Nixon And Kissinger Pas de Deux BOOKS OF THE TIMES; Substance Over Sex In Kennedy Biography The World: New Chapter, Old Debate; Would Kennedy Have Quit Vietnam? new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Zacharek-t.html?ex=1336708800&en=07b4f1e6842bae52&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Some of Tim’s Stories - S. E. Hinton 2007 Before “Buffy the Vampire Slayer” and “Veronica Mars” — but not before “Rebel Without a Cause” and the Shangri-Las — there was “The Outsiders” (1967), a novel by S. E. Hinton that cut to the heart of teenage anxiety and confusion as no other book had. Written in language whose rhythms felt true to the way kids talked, from the point of view of Ponyboy Curtis, a bright, idealistic 14-year-old who veers dangerously close to ending up on the wrong side of the law, “The Outsiders” had the vitality and the audacity of rock ’n’ roll — partly because Hinton was a teenager herself when she wrote it. OF TIM’S STORIES By S. E. Hinton. 151 pp. University of Oklahoma Press. $19.95. Inspired by the youth gang rivalries in her hometown, Tulsa, Okla., Hinton began writing “The Outsiders” when she was 15; she received the publishing contract on the day of her high school graduation. Even though “The Outsiders” represented the birth of a genre — previously, books for teenagers had focused mostly on dating issues or the woes of parent-child relationships — it was still, a year after its hardcover publication by Viking, just a paperback novel, the kind sold on squeaky drugstore racks. Just as it was set to go out of print, the paperback publisher, Dell, noticed an uptick in sales. Teachers had begun ordering multiples for their classrooms; they’d discovered that even teenagers who’d never finished a book in their lives would read “The Outsiders.” In the years since, Hinton, who still lives in Oklahoma, has written eight books, some for young adults, others for children or for grown-ups. The latest, “Some of Tim’s Stories,” is a compact set of vignettes about a young bartender named Mike and his conflicted relationship with his cousin, Terry: the two are closer than brothers, until a cruel twist drives them apart. In a series of interviews that make up the second half of the book, Hinton explains that the “Tim” of the title is the writer of these stories. “Mike” is Tim’s thinly disguised alter ego, a guy who can’t stop punishing himself for the ways in which he might have failed his cousin. He loses the one woman he loves most, and he gets drunk more than he should. But he also enrolls, somewhat accidentally, in a fiction-writing class at his local community college, and writing becomes a way for him to cope with his fear and guilt. Each of these stories is brief — several are just three or four pages — and Hinton trims her prose close to the bone. As Mike sits at his aunt’s kitchen table, eating a sandwich she’s prepared for him, Hinton, via Tim, takes one of his memories of growing up with Terry and carves it into a sharp, concise observation: “You two eat like horses for such skinny boys. They had heard that all their lives. Then they hit 20 and filled out, like someone had colored in an outline, and people said no wonder you two ate so much.” But brevity can work against a writer, too, and even though these stories are admirably direct, they also feel truncated and at times incomplete. Suddenly, the truth hits: What’s missing is the swaggering, dirty-dungaree dialogue of “The Outsiders” and the rambling yet weirdly concise interior monologues of Ponyboy, its confused but eminently likable narrator. There’s just no book like “The Outsiders,” and even Hinton seems to know it. The interviews with the author included in the collection — conducted by Teresa Miller, the founder and executive director of the Oklahoma Center for Poets and Writers and the editor of the University of Oklahoma’s “Oklahoma Stories & Storytelling” series, of which this is the second volume — throw off more sparks than the stories themselves. Hinton (whose full name is Susan Eloise; her publishers advised her at the beginning to use her initials, to prevent readers from prejudging a woman author writing from a guy’s point of view) says she believes Tim’s stories are the best writing she’s ever done. But she also seems to know she can’t recapture the raw, youthful energy of her first book: “I don’t compete with ‘The Outsiders.’ It’s there; I’m proud of it, but I’m through with it, like I am with Tim’s stories.” Could “The Outsiders” — or, for that matter, any of Hinton’s other novels for young adults, including “That Was Then, This Is Now” (1971) and “Tex” (1979) — even be written today? Among the numerous idiotic pronouncements people make about the past, whether we’re talking 40, 60 or even hundreds of years ago, is “Those were more innocent times.” Of course, any parent today will tell you that children are outgrowing childhood faster than ever, with toddlers requesting Bratz dolls and grade-schoolers taking weapons into class. But part of what makes Hinton’s books wonderful is the fearlessness with which she addressed all the things young people weren’t, and still aren’t, supposed to do: drag racing, fighting with knives (or guns) and, to name perhaps the most current taboo, smoking. Hinton’s books, refreshingly nonjudgmental, weren’t social tracts or cautionary tales designed to ward her readers off the things that might have killed them (although they might ultimately have had that beneficial effect). In “That Was Then, This Is Now,” the 16-year-old protagonist, Bryon, swings by the hospital room of a bandage-wrapped teenager who is in a great deal of pain after having been badly beaten. The kid begs Bryon for a smoke and Bryon obliges, holding a lit cigarette to the kid’s lips. The world of Hinton’s young adult books isn’t simpler or more innocent than the one we live in now. Yes, kids, smoking is bad, very bad! And even secondhand smoke can kill you. But does it hurt to be reminded that there once was a time, so very long ago, when sharing a cigarette could be an act of compassion, not corruption? Hinton may never top “The Outsiders.” But by telling it like it was, she left a record of the way things were — a record that can’t be revised or erased, even after we’ve crushed that last Marlboro box and left it behind forever. Stephanie Zacharek is a senior writer for Salon. Outsider, Out of the Shadows; With the Release of a Recut 'Outsiders,' a Secretive Author Is Willing to Talk CHRONICLE FICTION; Fire-Eaters, Flying Cats and Joseph Conrad Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Zacharek-t.html Some of Tim’s Stories - S. E. Hinton 2007 Before “Buffy the Vampire Slayer” and “Veronica Mars” — but not before “Rebel Without a Cause” and the Shangri-Las — there was “The Outsiders” (1967), a novel by S. E. Hinton that cut to the heart of teenage anxiety and confusion as no other book had. Written in language whose rhythms felt true to the way kids talked, from the point of view of Ponyboy Curtis, a bright, idealistic 14-year-old who veers dangerously close to ending up on the wrong side of the law, “The Outsiders” had the vitality and the audacity of rock ’n’ roll — partly because Hinton was a teenager herself when she wrote it. OF TIM’S STORIES By S. E. Hinton. 151 pp. University of Oklahoma Press. $19.95. Inspired by the youth gang rivalries in her hometown, Tulsa, Okla., Hinton began writing “The Outsiders” when she was 15; she received the publishing contract on the day of her high school graduation. Even though “The Outsiders” represented the birth of a genre — previously, books for teenagers had focused mostly on dating issues or the woes of parent-child relationships — it was still, a year after its hardcover publication by Viking, just a paperback novel, the kind sold on squeaky drugstore racks. Just as it was set to go out of print, the paperback publisher, Dell, noticed an uptick in sales. Teachers had begun ordering multiples for their classrooms; they’d discovered that even teenagers who’d never finished a book in their lives would read “The Outsiders.” In the years since, Hinton, who still lives in Oklahoma, has written eight books, some for young adults, others for children or for grown-ups. The latest, “Some of Tim’s Stories,” is a compact set of vignettes about a young bartender named Mike and his conflicted relationship with his cousin, Terry: the two are closer than brothers, until a cruel twist drives them apart. In a series of interviews that make up the second half of the book, Hinton explains that the “Tim” of the title is the writer of these stories. “Mike” is Tim’s thinly disguised alter ego, a guy who can’t stop punishing himself for the ways in which he might have failed his cousin. He loses the one woman he loves most, and he gets drunk more than he should. But he also enrolls, somewhat accidentally, in a fiction-writing class at his local community college, and writing becomes a way for him to cope with his fear and guilt. Each of these stories is brief — several are just three or four pages — and Hinton trims her prose close to the bone. As Mike sits at his aunt’s kitchen table, eating a sandwich she’s prepared for him, Hinton, via Tim, takes one of his memories of growing up with Terry and carves it into a sharp, concise observation: “You two eat like horses for such skinny boys. They had heard that all their lives. Then they hit 20 and filled out, like someone had colored in an outline, and people said no wonder you two ate so much.” But brevity can work against a writer, too, and even though these stories are admirably direct, they also feel truncated and at times incomplete. Suddenly, the truth hits: What’s missing is the swaggering, dirty-dungaree dialogue of “The Outsiders” and the rambling yet weirdly concise interior monologues of Ponyboy, its confused but eminently likable narrator. There’s just no book like “The Outsiders,” and even Hinton seems to know it. The interviews with the author included in the collection — conducted by Teresa Miller, the founder and executive director of the Oklahoma Center for Poets and Writers and the editor of the University of Oklahoma’s “Oklahoma Stories & Storytelling” series, of which this is the second volume — throw off more sparks than the stories themselves. Hinton (whose full name is Susan Eloise; her publishers advised her at the beginning to use her initials, to prevent readers from prejudging a woman author writing from a guy’s point of view) says she believes Tim’s stories are the best writing she’s ever done. But she also seems to know she can’t recapture the raw, youthful energy of her first book: “I don’t compete with ‘The Outsiders.’ It’s there; I’m proud of it, but I’m through with it, like I am with Tim’s stories.” Could “The Outsiders” — or, for that matter, any of Hinton’s other novels for young adults, including “That Was Then, This Is Now” (1971) and “Tex” (1979) — even be written today? Among the numerous idiotic pronouncements people make about the past, whether we’re talking 40, 60 or even hundreds of years ago, is “Those were more innocent times.” Of course, any parent today will tell you that children are outgrowing childhood faster than ever, with toddlers requesting Bratz dolls and grade-schoolers taking weapons into class. But part of what makes Hinton’s books wonderful is the fearlessness with which she addressed all the things young people weren’t, and still aren’t, supposed to do: drag racing, fighting with knives (or guns) and, to name perhaps the most current taboo, smoking. Hinton’s books, refreshingly nonjudgmental, weren’t social tracts or cautionary tales designed to ward her readers off the things that might have killed them (although they might ultimately have had that beneficial effect). In “That Was Then, This Is Now,” the 16-year-old protagonist, Bryon, swings by the hospital room of a bandage-wrapped teenager who is in a great deal of pain after having been badly beaten. The kid begs Bryon for a smoke and Bryon obliges, holding a lit cigarette to the kid’s lips. The world of Hinton’s young adult books isn’t simpler or more innocent than the one we live in now. Yes, kids, smoking is bad, very bad! And even secondhand smoke can kill you. But does it hurt to be reminded that there once was a time, so very long ago, when sharing a cigarette could be an act of compassion, not corruption? Hinton may never top “The Outsiders.” But by telling it like it was, she left a record of the way things were — a record that can’t be revised or erased, even after we’ve crushed that last Marlboro box and left it behind forever. Stephanie Zacharek is a senior writer for Salon. Outsider, Out of the Shadows; With the Release of a Recut 'Outsiders,' a Secretive Author Is Willing to Talk CHRONICLE FICTION; Fire-Eaters, Flying Cats and Joseph Conrad new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Rafferty-t.html The Yiddish Policemen's Union - Michael Chabon 2007 “Don’t get wistful on me,” says a sly old man in Michael Chabon’s sly new novel, his first big serious one since the best-selling, -winning “Amazing Adventures of Kavalier & Clay,” seven long years ago. “God knows I’ve had my fill of wistful Jews, starting with myself.” Chabon, starting with himself as writers should, seems determined in “The Yiddish Policemen’s Union” to stave off wistfulness by any means, even if it requires him to turn the story of the endless, endemic disappointment of the Jews — their millenniums-old-and-counting wait for the Messiah — into a screwball, alternative-reality, hard-boiled mystery, set, for maximum incongruity, in Alaska. The impressively wacky premise is that after the Holocaust, large numbers of Jews were relocated to Sitka, where by statute they were allowed to make their home for the next 60 years, at the end of which the town would revert to the control of Alaska. Israel, it appears, didn’t work out: the Jewish settlers there were ejected “with savage finality” in 1948. “The Holy Land,” the novel tells us, “has never seemed more remote or unattainable than it does to a Jew of Sitka.” The godforsakenness of the place is something more than a figure of speech. YIDDISH POLICEMEN’S UNION 414 pp. HarperCollins Publishers. $26.95. Books: The Frozen Chosen ‘The Yiddish Policemen’s Union’ Stuck in just another temporary, cruelly provisional homeland, farther than ever from the one originally promised — yes, you could get a little wistful in a situation like that. But it soon becomes clear that Sitka’s very remoteness, its impossible distance from the dreamed-of site of redemption and fulfillment, suits both Chabon and Meyer Landsman, his alcoholic homicide-cop hero, right down to the frozen ground. This bustling Yiddish-speaking enclave in the far north is so improbable, so irredeemably absurd, that it functions as a kind of comfort zone for an irreligious Jew like Landsman, a daily confirmation of his unbelief: the chances of the Messiah turning up in Sitka look gratifyingly slim. The District, as its residents call it, is a good place for Chabon because it’s a fictional nowhere he can populate as he pleases. And populate it he does, with delirious fecundity, filling the icy streets with an enormous cast of cops, thugs, schemers, rabbis, chess fanatics and obsessives of every description, all crowded together, as if they were elbowing for space in a densely drawn comic-book panel. It’s obvious that the creation of this strange, vibrant, unreal world is Chabon’s idea of heaven. He seems happy here, almost giddy, high on the imaginative freedom that has always been the most cherished value in his fiction. He gives Landsman a half-Jewish, half-Tlingit partner, an observant hulk who goes by the name of Berko Shemets but is known to the tribesmen of his Indian mother as Johnny “the Jew” Bear. He blithely invents a Hasidic sect, the Verbovers, that operates as a sinister and rigorously disciplined criminal gang. He dreams up elaborate conspiracies, both mundane and cosmic. And he sprays metaphors like a drunk with an Uzi. “No matter how powerful,” Landsman muses sadly at one point, “every yid in the District is tethered by the leash of 1948.” And, as if that weren’t quite sufficient, he riffs on: “His kingdom is bound in its nutshell. His sky is a painted dome, his horizon an electrified fence. He has the flight and knows the freedom only of a balloon on a string.” I think it’s fair to say that the writing in “The Yiddish Policemen’s Union” — of which that passage is fairly typical — is unencumbered by leashes or strings, unconfined by domes or fences. This nut is out of its shell. It’s fortunate that the novel’s prose is so untrammeled, because murder-mystery plotting can be a confinement too, a dark locked room whose doors open only when the solution, Messiah-like, arrives at the end. The murder victim in this story is a junkie chess player who happens to have met his maker in the same miserable hotel where Landsman, divorced and depressed, has been hanging his battered hat. The dead man is registered as Emanuel Lasker, transparently an alias: the name, the detective knows, is that of a famous grand master of the early 20th century. There’s a chessboard in the room, showing a tricky endgame in progress. This is, of course, a metaphor for many things, including the imminent demise of the District itself, due for the mandated reversion in a couple of months — and also including, as it turns out, what some Christians call the end times. The board is set up in a dire position called a Zugzwang, in which the losing player is “forced to move,” Landsman explains, even “when you know that it’s only going to lead to you getting checkmated.” Which makes it, inescapably, a metaphor for the Diaspora. Terrence Rafferty is a frequent contributor to the Book Review. 100 articles a month from The Archive - get it now with TimesSelect FUNNY PAGES | SUNDAY SERIAL; &#8216;Gentlemen of the Road&#8217; BOOKS OF THE TIMES; Looking For a Home In the Limbo Of Alaska BOOKS; The Frozen Chosen ON RELIGION; Was There a Driving Theological Force Behind Spiderman? new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics Cleaning the Elephants, 1951 N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Rafferty-t.html?ex=1336708800&en=ef576750ea9d2b2b&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss The Yiddish Policemen's Union - Michael Chabon 2007 “Don’t get wistful on me,” says a sly old man in Michael Chabon’s sly new novel, his first big serious one since the best-selling, -winning “Amazing Adventures of Kavalier & Clay,” seven long years ago. “God knows I’ve had my fill of wistful Jews, starting with myself.” Chabon, starting with himself as writers should, seems determined in “The Yiddish Policemen’s Union” to stave off wistfulness by any means, even if it requires him to turn the story of the endless, endemic disappointment of the Jews — their millenniums-old-and-counting wait for the Messiah — into a screwball, alternative-reality, hard-boiled mystery, set, for maximum incongruity, in Alaska. The impressively wacky premise is that after the Holocaust, large numbers of Jews were relocated to Sitka, where by statute they were allowed to make their home for the next 60 years, at the end of which the town would revert to the control of Alaska. Israel, it appears, didn’t work out: the Jewish settlers there were ejected “with savage finality” in 1948. “The Holy Land,” the novel tells us, “has never seemed more remote or unattainable than it does to a Jew of Sitka.” The godforsakenness of the place is something more than a figure of speech. YIDDISH POLICEMEN’S UNION 414 pp. HarperCollins Publishers. $26.95. Books: The Frozen Chosen ‘The Yiddish Policemen’s Union’ Stuck in just another temporary, cruelly provisional homeland, farther than ever from the one originally promised — yes, you could get a little wistful in a situation like that. But it soon becomes clear that Sitka’s very remoteness, its impossible distance from the dreamed-of site of redemption and fulfillment, suits both Chabon and Meyer Landsman, his alcoholic homicide-cop hero, right down to the frozen ground. This bustling Yiddish-speaking enclave in the far north is so improbable, so irredeemably absurd, that it functions as a kind of comfort zone for an irreligious Jew like Landsman, a daily confirmation of his unbelief: the chances of the Messiah turning up in Sitka look gratifyingly slim. The District, as its residents call it, is a good place for Chabon because it’s a fictional nowhere he can populate as he pleases. And populate it he does, with delirious fecundity, filling the icy streets with an enormous cast of cops, thugs, schemers, rabbis, chess fanatics and obsessives of every description, all crowded together, as if they were elbowing for space in a densely drawn comic-book panel. It’s obvious that the creation of this strange, vibrant, unreal world is Chabon’s idea of heaven. He seems happy here, almost giddy, high on the imaginative freedom that has always been the most cherished value in his fiction. He gives Landsman a half-Jewish, half-Tlingit partner, an observant hulk who goes by the name of Berko Shemets but is known to the tribesmen of his Indian mother as Johnny “the Jew” Bear. He blithely invents a Hasidic sect, the Verbovers, that operates as a sinister and rigorously disciplined criminal gang. He dreams up elaborate conspiracies, both mundane and cosmic. And he sprays metaphors like a drunk with an Uzi. “No matter how powerful,” Landsman muses sadly at one point, “every yid in the District is tethered by the leash of 1948.” And, as if that weren’t quite sufficient, he riffs on: “His kingdom is bound in its nutshell. His sky is a painted dome, his horizon an electrified fence. He has the flight and knows the freedom only of a balloon on a string.” I think it’s fair to say that the writing in “The Yiddish Policemen’s Union” — of which that passage is fairly typical — is unencumbered by leashes or strings, unconfined by domes or fences. This nut is out of its shell. It’s fortunate that the novel’s prose is so untrammeled, because murder-mystery plotting can be a confinement too, a dark locked room whose doors open only when the solution, Messiah-like, arrives at the end. The murder victim in this story is a junkie chess player who happens to have met his maker in the same miserable hotel where Landsman, divorced and depressed, has been hanging his battered hat. The dead man is registered as Emanuel Lasker, transparently an alias: the name, the detective knows, is that of a famous grand master of the early 20th century. There’s a chessboard in the room, showing a tricky endgame in progress. This is, of course, a metaphor for many things, including the imminent demise of the District itself, due for the mandated reversion in a couple of months — and also including, as it turns out, what some Christians call the end times. The board is set up in a dire position called a Zugzwang, in which the losing player is “forced to move,” Landsman explains, even “when you know that it’s only going to lead to you getting checkmated.” Which makes it, inescapably, a metaphor for the Diaspora. Terrence Rafferty is a frequent contributor to the Book Review. 100 articles a month from The Archive - get it now with TimesSelect FUNNY PAGES | SUNDAY SERIAL; &#8216;Gentlemen of the Road&#8217; BOOKS OF THE TIMES; Looking For a Home In the Limbo Of Alaska BOOKS; The Frozen Chosen ON RELIGION; Was There a Driving Theological Force Behind Spiderman? Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Kantor-t.html?ex=1336708800&en=028917aebb39a34d&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss One Perfect Day: The Selling of the American Wedding - Rebecca Mead 2007 The late, great writer Marjorie Williams once confessed that reading “Fast Food Nation,” Eric Schlosser’s investigation into the fast-food industry, left her craving a Burger King fix. I had a similar reaction to “One Perfect Day,” Rebecca Mead’s dour tour of the American wedding business, which made me suddenly long for a frilly Saturday night nuptial blowout. Selling of the American Wedding. 245 pp. The Penguin Press. $25.95. wait. I already had one, four years ago. The whole thing turned out pretty great — but not according to Mead. For her, the American wedding is an exercise in cheap sentiment and pricey self-indulgence, orchestrated by an industry that cunningly plays on the romantic delusions of the betrothed. She has the darkest possible view of its preparatory rituals: by flipping dreamily through Modern Bride and Weddings, a bride is trying to create a new self “whose skin always glows with happiness, whose life is one of such grace that the fine china will always be in use.” Registering — for water glasses, an ice-cream maker, the usual tchotchkes — is an exercise in “licensed covetousness.” By her analysis, the betrothed throw themselves into wedding planning because they know married life will ultimately be a letdown. , Rebecca — come over some night for homemade ice cream and see! Though she speaks of the entire wedding industry, Mead actually doesn’t seem interested in celebrations like mine — which was on the tasteful side, if I do say so myself. Mead is so outraged by the gilded picture presented by bridal magazines that she overcorrects and gives us a book full of tawdry, tacky affairs, where the dresses are ill-fitting, the officiant is a hired gun and the couple flushes away more than they can afford. These weddings take place mostly in Las Vegas, at Disney World, on an overcrowded stretch of beach in Aruba or in Gatlinburg, Tenn., home to kitschy wedding chapels and a round-the-clock “marry-thon.” In other words, Mead has reduced the American wedding to its cheesiest and most venal elements, and then written a book about how cheesy and venal American weddings are. But even that book would have been much better if Mead had quoted more than a handful of brides. She’s a gifted writer, mostly for The New Yorker, and she’s written well about romance in the past. “One Perfect Day” has a scattering of vibrant characters — the wedding planner who recreates the imperial-Russia-themed nuptials of Joan Rivers’s daughter Melissa on a $200 budget, the ones who entertain themselves at an industry conference by whacking at a Bridezilla piñata. But almost none of them are brides. Inexplicably, the book is almost entirely devoid of them. (Don’t even ask about grooms.) Like a tourist observing wildlife, Mead tracks and observes brides — like one trying on a dress in a David’s Bridal store — but instead of interviewing them, just stares and assigns them thoughts. The main bridal character in the book is a kind of imagined one, wearing a “gown in which she can barely move” and a “veil behind which her smile, white teeth bleached to a photogenic whiteness, is temporarily concealed.” The book’s pages practically curl from this sort of disdain. The courthouse in Las Vegas where wedding licenses are handed out is “one of the most insalubrious places I have ever spent time,” Mead sniffs, as if she were expecting an edifying experience. Of course, Mead is right about her book’s broadest point: yes, sure, lots of American weddings are overblown confections; and O.K., that probably tells us something about ourselves. But Mead rushes away from her most incisive thoughts — about the way wedding photos, propped up on office and living-room walls, serve as a kind of advertising campaign for the marriage in question, about how weddings became splashier and more expensive just as no-fault divorce made marriage a less secure proposition than ever before. Besides, the excess of the modern American wedding is precisely what makes it such crazy, memorable fun. In a decade of frequent wedding-going, I have been to one where entire lobes of foie gras were sliced and sautéed to order for guests, another where a dessert table was loaded with more than a thousand cookies home-baked by the bride’s family, and another where an entertainer wearing a giant plastic John Travolta head entered the dance floor to the strains of “Saturday Night Fever.” Was each one of these touches overkill? If you insist. Was each one delightful? You bet. Perhaps this is why, as a glance at this newspaper’s Vows column will attest, even blue-blooded weddings are now as Trump-like as everyone else’s. Today, even the preppiest country-club bride is likely to write her own goofy vows, wear a $5,000 gown with an immodest neckline and treat herself to a little Botox before the big event. We’re all nouveau riche now. The rise of the big, luxe wedding isn’t ultimately that different from the rise of the big, luxe television; the big, luxe handbag; or other fashionable, unnecessary supersize treats. The difference is that weddings, unlike most other things we purchase, reliably deliver heart-stopping measures of joy. Do grandmothers cry just as hard when a bride is married, as Mead was, at a courthouse while wearing office clothes? Perhaps. But most of us would rather be out under a tent, enjoying Champagne, slow dances and the company of a plastic John Travolta. Jodi Kantor is a reporter at The Times. Talk; Questionable Letter For a Liar's Memoir Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/books/index.html Books - Review 'God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything' Reviewed by MICHAEL KINSLEY Christopher Hitchens is an old-fashioned (and very entertaining) village atheist, trying to pick arguments with the good citizens on their way to church. 'The Yiddish Policemen's Union' Reviewed by TERRENCE RAFFERTY Michael Chabon’s new novel is a screwball, hard-boiled whodunit set in a Jewish settlement in Alaska. A Profile of Michael Chabon 'Nixon and Kissinger: Partners in Power' Reviewed by MARK ATWOOD LAWRENCE Richard Nixon and Henry Kissinger distrusted and insulted each other, yet they worked together well. 'Some of Tim’s Stories' By S. E. HINTON Reviewed by STEPHANIE ZACHAREK New stories, and interviews, from Outsiders.” 'One Perfect Day: The Selling of the American Wedding' Reviewed by JODI KANTOR In her new book, Rebecca Mead views the excesses of the modern American wedding. A Profile of Rebecca Mead 'John Donne: The Reformed Soul' Reviewed by THOMAS MALLON A biography traces John Donne’s path from lustful Catholic poet to passionate Anglican preacher. Reviewed by CHRISTOPHER BENFEY In this thriller, murders separated by centuries are linked by Isaac Newton and his experiments with light. She Carries Weapons; They Are Called Words Mohja Kakf, a poet and professor, walks the tightrope between her Arab American worlds. Author and Surfer to Share in Proceeds of Waves Book Susan Casey is hiring Laird Hamilton, one of best known celebrity surfers, to help her write about the science of giant waves. her new book on the American wedding industry, Rebecca Mead speaks on the garish events that weddings have become, and what it tells us about ourselves. Classic Book About America’s Indians Gains a Few Flourishes as a Film To broaden appeal for a television version of “Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee,” the 1971 classic by Dee Brown, HBO rearranged people and facts. Book Not Ready for Print? You Can Whip Up an Audiobook for a Podcast for Now By ANDREW ADAM NEWMAN Audiobooks are fast, inexpensive and easy to record, leading publishers to look to the format to fuel early interest in paper books. ‘God Is Not Great’ “Why, if god was the creator of all things, were we supposed to ‘praise’ him so incessantly for doing what came to him naturally?” ‘The Yiddish Policemen’s Union’ “‘These are strange times to be a Jew,’ Tenenboym agrees. ‘No doubt about it.’” “Nixon's postpresidential resentments were of a piece with longstanding sensitivity to personal slights.” “I have tried to tease out the truths from the untruths in that series of events that seeped out through Elizabeth's death . . .” from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 Featuring poetry, the young-adult version of "An Inconvenient Truth," comics for teens and an "almost perfect" picture book. Slide Show: Best Illustrated Books This week: Christopher Hitchens, Is Not Great”; Julie Just on children’s books; Tim Weiner on E. Howard Hunt; and Dwight Garner, senior editor, with best-seller news. Sam Tanenhaus, the editor of the Book Review, is the host. This Week's Book Review Podcast ( What future doctors (and patients) can learn from Tolstoy, Philip Roth — and “The Secret.” The Funny Pages | Sunday Serial This week, Chapter 1: As one door opens, another one closes. . . . The 10 Best Books of 2006 100 Notable Books of 2006 Best American Fiction Survey Nobel Prize in Literature Book Review Editor Responds Sign Up for the Books Update Receive a selective overview of new book reviews and features every Sunday. SEARCH BOOK REVIEWS SINCE 1981: MOST POPULAR - BOOKS Because It&#8217;s Good for You, That&#8217;s Why In Churchill&#8217;s Rise to Power, a Rough Path of Rebellion She Carries Weapons; They Are Called Words Three Writers of Nonfiction Are Honored Essay: Why Not the Worst? Not Ready for Print? You Can Whip Up an Audiobook for a Podcast for Now Not the Worst? The Young and the Restless new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics What movie should you see? Buy, sell or rent a home. Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. Continuous coverage of business news. Photos, fine art, books and more.
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/books/index.html?partner=rssnyt Books - Review 'God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything' Reviewed by MICHAEL KINSLEY Christopher Hitchens is an old-fashioned (and very entertaining) village atheist, trying to pick arguments with the good citizens on their way to church. 'The Yiddish Policemen's Union' Reviewed by TERRENCE RAFFERTY Michael Chabon’s new novel is a screwball, hard-boiled whodunit set in a Jewish settlement in Alaska. A Profile of Michael Chabon 'Nixon and Kissinger: Partners in Power' Reviewed by MARK ATWOOD LAWRENCE Richard Nixon and Henry Kissinger distrusted and insulted each other, yet they worked together well. 'Some of Tim’s Stories' By S. E. HINTON Reviewed by STEPHANIE ZACHAREK New stories, and interviews, from Outsiders.” 'One Perfect Day: The Selling of the American Wedding' Reviewed by JODI KANTOR In her new book, Rebecca Mead views the excesses of the modern American wedding. A Profile of Rebecca Mead 'John Donne: The Reformed Soul' Reviewed by THOMAS MALLON A biography traces John Donne’s path from lustful Catholic poet to passionate Anglican preacher. Reviewed by CHRISTOPHER BENFEY In this thriller, murders separated by centuries are linked by Isaac Newton and his experiments with light. She Carries Weapons; They Are Called Words Mohja Kakf, a poet and professor, walks the tightrope between her Arab American worlds. Author and Surfer to Share in Proceeds of Waves Book Susan Casey is hiring Laird Hamilton, one of best known celebrity surfers, to help her write about the science of giant waves. her new book on the American wedding industry, Rebecca Mead speaks on the garish events that weddings have become, and what it tells us about ourselves. Classic Book About America’s Indians Gains a Few Flourishes as a Film To broaden appeal for a television version of “Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee,” the 1971 classic by Dee Brown, HBO rearranged people and facts. Book Not Ready for Print? You Can Whip Up an Audiobook for a Podcast for Now By ANDREW ADAM NEWMAN Audiobooks are fast, inexpensive and easy to record, leading publishers to look to the format to fuel early interest in paper books. ‘God Is Not Great’ “Why, if god was the creator of all things, were we supposed to ‘praise’ him so incessantly for doing what came to him naturally?” ‘The Yiddish Policemen’s Union’ “‘These are strange times to be a Jew,’ Tenenboym agrees. ‘No doubt about it.’” “Nixon's postpresidential resentments were of a piece with longstanding sensitivity to personal slights.” “I have tried to tease out the truths from the untruths in that series of events that seeped out through Elizabeth's death . . .” from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 Featuring poetry, the young-adult version of "An Inconvenient Truth," comics for teens and an "almost perfect" picture book. Slide Show: Best Illustrated Books This week: Christopher Hitchens, Is Not Great”; Julie Just on children’s books; Tim Weiner on E. Howard Hunt; and Dwight Garner, senior editor, with best-seller news. Sam Tanenhaus, the editor of the Book Review, is the host. This Week's Book Review Podcast ( What future doctors (and patients) can learn from Tolstoy, Philip Roth — and “The Secret.” The Funny Pages | Sunday Serial This week, Chapter 1: As one door opens, another one closes. . . . The 10 Best Books of 2006 100 Notable Books of 2006 Best American Fiction Survey Nobel Prize in Literature Book Review Editor Responds Sign Up for the Books Update Receive a selective overview of new book reviews and features every Sunday. SEARCH BOOK REVIEWS SINCE 1981: MOST POPULAR - BOOKS Because It&#8217;s Good for You, That&#8217;s Why In Churchill&#8217;s Rise to Power, a Rough Path of Rebellion She Carries Weapons; They Are Called Words Three Writers of Nonfiction Are Honored Essay: Why Not the Worst? Not Ready for Print? You Can Whip Up an Audiobook for a Podcast for Now Not the Worst? The Young and the Restless new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics Photos, fine art, books and more. What’s new in technology? Post a job online today! Tell us your nursing story. Inspiration & lessons. Buy, sell or rent a home.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Lawrence-t.html?ex=1336708800&en=20432fe73493cca2&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Nixon and Kissinger: Partners in Power - Robert Dallek MARK ATWOOD LAWRENCE Published: May 13, 2007 Visionaries or cynics? Peacemakers or warmongers? Few individuals in recent times have provoked as much controversy as and his partner in foreign affairs, . Admirers laud the two men for dramatically easing the cold war and sensibly recognizing the limits of American power to shape the world. Critics castigate them as Machiavellians who undertook reckless policies in the third world, often throwing American power behind brutal tyrants in elusive quests for international stability. 740 pp. HarperCollins Publishers. $32.50. Robert Dallek argues for another possibility: the two men were visionaries and cynics at the same time. On first consideration, this is an unremarkable conclusion. And yet “Nixon and Kissinger: Partners in Power” makes a valuable contribution to the study of American policy making during the turbulent years from 1969 through 1974. Partly, it does this by transcending the stale polemics that have surrounded the study of Nixon and Kissinger. But its more significant, if not wholly convincing, achievement is to connect the unevenness of their policy-making performance with the ups and downs of their peculiar personalities. “The careers of both Nixon and Kissinger,” Dallek asserts, “reflect the extent to which great accomplishments and public wrongdoing can spring from inner lives.” This isn’t the first time Dallek, a prolific biographer of American presidents, has challenged simplistic characterizations of public men by delving into their private behavior. In 2003, his best-selling study, “An Unfinished Life: , 1917-1963,” drew on long-secret medical records to describe Kennedy’s epic struggles against a variety of ailments. “Nixon and Kissinger” contains no such spectacular revelations. Indeed, Dallek’s extensive use of recently declassified material — millions of pages of national security documents, 2,800 hours of Nixon’s secret tape recordings and 20,000 pages of transcriptions of Kissinger’s phone calls — seems to have turned up nothing to revise the broad contours of either man’s life. Rather, Dallek exploits this new material mainly for the quotations and fresh details that enable him to paint rich portraits of his two subjects. Superficially, Nixon and Kissinger, who served first as Nixon’s national security adviser and then as his secretary of state, had precious little in common. The president, son of a California grocer, identified with the hopes and grievances of middle America and bristled with resentment against East Coast sophisticates. Kissinger, a German-born Jew, rose to prominence as a pathbreaking scholar of international politics at Harvard and reveled in his acceptance among the political and intellectual elite. But fundamentally, Dallek shows, the two were remarkably alike. Both wanted desperately to leave a deep imprint on history. Both were ruthless pragmatists who disregarded decorum, principle and sometimes the law to get what they wanted. And both were insecure loners who distrusted, deceived and abused just about everyone, including each other. For these troubled men, Dallek writes, politics offered “a form of vocational therapy” — an arena where they could exercise control and find approval. Shared neuroses led to jealousy and hostility. Kissinger privately assailed Nixon as “that madman” and “the meatball mind.” Nixon returned the favor, demeaning Kissinger as his “Jew boy” and calling him “psychopathic.” He fretted incessantly that Kissinger was getting too much credit for the administration’s accomplishments and repeatedly considered firing him. Still, Dallek writes, their common characteristics did even more to bond the two men, who formed “one of or possibly the most significant White House collaboration in U.S. history.” Under some circumstances, Dallek suggests, their blend of ideological flexibility and monumental egotism produced bold foreign policy advances, most notably the opening of relations with Communist China in 1971-72. And he praises Nixon and Kissinger even more exuberantly for initiating détente with the Soviet Union. Agreements negotiated with Moscow, he argues, helped end the cold war by lowering Soviet hostility to the outside world and opening the country to Western influences, which ate away at Communist rule from the inside. Kissinger’s efforts to make peace in the Middle East after the 1973 Arab-Israeli war similarly laid the groundwork for a later breakthrough, in this case the landmark 1978 accord between Egypt and Israel. Mark Atwood Lawrence teaches history at the University of Texas at Austin. He is the Burden: Europe and the American Commitment to War in Vietnam.” The Nixon And Kissinger Pas de Deux BOOKS OF THE TIMES; Substance Over Sex In Kennedy Biography The World: New Chapter, Old Debate; Would Kennedy Have Quit Vietnam? Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Mallon-t.html John Donne: The Reformed Soul - John Stubbs 2007 It has always been convenient to see John Donne (1572-1631) as the St. Augustine of English letters, made priestly and pure in his own good time, and not too soon to have produced the brainy carnal thrustings of his early love poems. Donne himself made things misleadingly neat for posterity by drawing his own contrasts between “Jack Donne” and “Dr. Donne,” dean of St. Paul’s Cathedral, and by setting “the Mistresse of my youth, Poetry,” against “the wyfe of mine age, Divinity.” pp. W. W. Norton & Company. $35. Of course, the outward circumstances and inner workings of Donne’s life were too complicated for a clean leap from one phase to the other. John Stubbs’s vivid new biography makes clear that the poet’s early verse is more emotionally disparate (“tender, brutal, cocky, manically unsure, knowingly sad”) than we often recall, and that Donne’s “desire for variation” was lifelong, part of an encompassing need to be “involved, employed, absorbed” in all that took place in this world as well as in everything that might lead to the next. “Change is the nursery,” the poet wrote in his third elegy, “Of musicke, joy, life, and eternity.” When it came to the actual nursery and to subsequent childhood, Donne possessed a distinctly un-Wordsworthian desire to be finished with both as soon as possible, so that “the real pleasure of life,” as his biographer puts it, could begin. Stubbs shares the impatience of his subject, plunging Donne into sexual opportunity and sectarian danger within the first two dozen pages of his book. The talented young Elizabethan, son of an ironmonger, felt more compelled to be a gentleman than to remain a Roman Catholic, a lucky enough preference during the still new and brutal English Reformation. For the sake of the old faith, Donne’s mother would exile herself to the Continent and his brother, Henry, would die inside Newgate prison. John Donne was set upon success and preferment, not martyrdom. Legal studies left him less excited than forays into literature and theology, but through them he acquired the connections and expertise to secure a place inside a royal court whose corruption he satirized in verse that he circulated but did not publish. In 1596 and 1597, he joined the Earl of Essex and Sir Walter Raleigh on expeditions against the Spanish to Cadiz and the Azores, after which he came home to a position as secretary to Sir Thomas Egerton, a judge in Chancery and Lord Keeper of the Seal. Donne knew enough not to follow Essex’s wobbly star on a later expedition to subdue the rebellious Irish, and he may even have been present at the earl’s beheading in 1601. Any real limits on Donne’s advancement stemmed less from the discreet continuation of his Catholicism — he was, in fact, coming to believe that overzealous Papists bore the chief blame for their own persecution — than from true love. The versifier who expected no constancy from women or himself, in whose fast pentameter “roaving hands” could play upon whatever female form had just been unlaced, now found himself inconveniently captivated by Lord Egerton’s teenage niece, Ann More. “John Donne, Ann Donne, Undone” went the famous epigram, attributed to Donne himself, after their secret marriage. Ann’s wealthy, titled father raged at the lovers’ deception and economic inequality, while Donne maintained metaphorical precision in begging Sir George More’s forgiveness: “Though perchance yow intend not utter destruction, yet the way through which I fall towards yt is so headlong, that being thus push’d, I shall soone be at bottome.” Both a civil commission and the ecclesiastical courts upheld the poet’s union with Ann, and Sir George gradually relented in his disfavor, but the marriage led to one “crushing disappointment” after another for Donne, who endured years of being “passed over every single time” a position fell vacant that might keep him financially afloat and in the social mix. In their cold, germ-ridden house outside London, Ann Donne was constantly pregnant and her husband consistently miserable. The family was kept going on what Donne “scraped together from fawning and favor-mongering around Court,” but sickness and despair motivated him to write “Biathanatos,” a “secret treatise on suicide,” in 1608. Even so, through all this grimness, the marriage gave rise to love poems in which Donne’s emotional devotion appears as strong as his erstwhile bachelor libido. Donne himself understood why his and Ann’s love continued to thrive: “We had not one another at so cheap a rate, as that we should ever be weary of one another.” Thomas Mallon’s books include “In Fact: Essays on Writers and Writing.” His latest novel, “Fellow Travelers,” has just been published. new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics Men's Denim Authentic Pigment-Dyed Box Hood N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Mallon-t.html?ex=1336708800&en=5a43ac8624306e5a&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss John Donne: The Reformed Soul - John Stubbs 2007 It has always been convenient to see John Donne (1572-1631) as the St. Augustine of English letters, made priestly and pure in his own good time, and not too soon to have produced the brainy carnal thrustings of his early love poems. Donne himself made things misleadingly neat for posterity by drawing his own contrasts between “Jack Donne” and “Dr. Donne,” dean of St. Paul’s Cathedral, and by setting “the Mistresse of my youth, Poetry,” against “the wyfe of mine age, Divinity.” pp. W. W. Norton & Company. $35. Of course, the outward circumstances and inner workings of Donne’s life were too complicated for a clean leap from one phase to the other. John Stubbs’s vivid new biography makes clear that the poet’s early verse is more emotionally disparate (“tender, brutal, cocky, manically unsure, knowingly sad”) than we often recall, and that Donne’s “desire for variation” was lifelong, part of an encompassing need to be “involved, employed, absorbed” in all that took place in this world as well as in everything that might lead to the next. “Change is the nursery,” the poet wrote in his third elegy, “Of musicke, joy, life, and eternity.” When it came to the actual nursery and to subsequent childhood, Donne possessed a distinctly un-Wordsworthian desire to be finished with both as soon as possible, so that “the real pleasure of life,” as his biographer puts it, could begin. Stubbs shares the impatience of his subject, plunging Donne into sexual opportunity and sectarian danger within the first two dozen pages of his book. The talented young Elizabethan, son of an ironmonger, felt more compelled to be a gentleman than to remain a Roman Catholic, a lucky enough preference during the still new and brutal English Reformation. For the sake of the old faith, Donne’s mother would exile herself to the Continent and his brother, Henry, would die inside Newgate prison. John Donne was set upon success and preferment, not martyrdom. Legal studies left him less excited than forays into literature and theology, but through them he acquired the connections and expertise to secure a place inside a royal court whose corruption he satirized in verse that he circulated but did not publish. In 1596 and 1597, he joined the Earl of Essex and Sir Walter Raleigh on expeditions against the Spanish to Cadiz and the Azores, after which he came home to a position as secretary to Sir Thomas Egerton, a judge in Chancery and Lord Keeper of the Seal. Donne knew enough not to follow Essex’s wobbly star on a later expedition to subdue the rebellious Irish, and he may even have been present at the earl’s beheading in 1601. Any real limits on Donne’s advancement stemmed less from the discreet continuation of his Catholicism — he was, in fact, coming to believe that overzealous Papists bore the chief blame for their own persecution — than from true love. The versifier who expected no constancy from women or himself, in whose fast pentameter “roaving hands” could play upon whatever female form had just been unlaced, now found himself inconveniently captivated by Lord Egerton’s teenage niece, Ann More. “John Donne, Ann Donne, Undone” went the famous epigram, attributed to Donne himself, after their secret marriage. Ann’s wealthy, titled father raged at the lovers’ deception and economic inequality, while Donne maintained metaphorical precision in begging Sir George More’s forgiveness: “Though perchance yow intend not utter destruction, yet the way through which I fall towards yt is so headlong, that being thus push’d, I shall soone be at bottome.” Both a civil commission and the ecclesiastical courts upheld the poet’s union with Ann, and Sir George gradually relented in his disfavor, but the marriage led to one “crushing disappointment” after another for Donne, who endured years of being “passed over every single time” a position fell vacant that might keep him financially afloat and in the social mix. In their cold, germ-ridden house outside London, Ann Donne was constantly pregnant and her husband consistently miserable. The family was kept going on what Donne “scraped together from fawning and favor-mongering around Court,” but sickness and despair motivated him to write “Biathanatos,” a “secret treatise on suicide,” in 1608. Even so, through all this grimness, the marriage gave rise to love poems in which Donne’s emotional devotion appears as strong as his erstwhile bachelor libido. Donne himself understood why his and Ann’s love continued to thrive: “We had not one another at so cheap a rate, as that we should ever be weary of one another.” Thomas Mallon’s books include “In Fact: Essays on Writers and Writing.” His latest novel, “Fellow Travelers,” has just been published. Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard New York City Renters Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/13/books/review/Kinsley-t.html God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything - Christopher Hitchens 2007 Observers of the Christopher Hitchens phenomenon have been expecting a book about religion from him around now. But this impressive and enjoyable attack on everything so many people hold dear is not the book we were expecting. IS NOT GREAT How Religion Poisons Everything. 307 pp. Twelve/Warner Books. $24.99. ‘God Is Not Great’ Mark Mahaney for in London 30 or more years ago, then in New York and for the last couple of decades in Washington, Hitchens has established himself as a character. This character draws on such familiar sources as the novels of P. G. Wodehouse, Evelyn Waugh and ; the leftist politics of the 1960s (British variant); and — of course — the person of George Orwell. (Others might throw in the flower-clutching Bunthorne from Gilbert and Sullivan’s “Patience,” but that is probably not an intentional influence.) Hitchens is the bohemian and the swell, the dashing foreign correspondent, the painstaking literary critic and the intellectual engagé. He charms Washington hostesses but will set off a stink bomb in the salon if the opportunity arises. His conversation sparkles, not quite effortlessly, and if he is a bit too quick to resort to French in search of le mot juste, his jewels of erudition, though flashy, are real. Or at least they fool me. Hitchens was right to choose Washington over New York and London. His enemies would like to believe he is a fraud. But he isn’t, as the very existence of his many enemies tends to prove. He is self-styled, to be sure, but no more so than many others in Washington — or even in New York or London — who are not nearly as good at it. He is a principled dissolute, with the courage of his dissolution: he enjoys smoking and drinking, and not just the reputation for smoking and drinking — although he enjoys that too. And through it all he is productive to an extent that seems like cheating: 23 books, pamphlets, collections and collaborations so far; a long and often heavily researched column every month in Vanity Fair; frequent fusillades in Slate and elsewhere; and speeches, debates and other public spectacles whenever offered. The big strategic challenge for a career like this is to remain interesting, and the easiest tactic for doing that is surprise. If they expect you to say X, you say minus X. Consistency is foolish, as the man said. (Didn’t he?) Under the unwritten and somewhat eccentric rules of American public discourse, a statement that contradicts everything you have ever said before is considered for that reason to be especially sincere, courageous and dependable. At The New Republic in the 1980s, when I was the editor, we used to joke about changing our name to “Even the Liberal New Republic,” because that was how we were referred to whenever we took a conservative position on something, which was often. Then came the day when we took a liberal position on something and we were referred to as “Even the Conservative New Republic.” As this example illustrates, among writers about politics, the surprise technique usually means starting left and turning right. Trouble is, you do this once and what’s your next party trick? Christopher Hitchens had seemed to be solving this problem by turning his conversion into an ideological “Dance of the Seven Veils.” Long ago he came out against abortion. Interesting! Then he discovered and made quite a kosher meal of the fact that his mother, deceased, was Jewish, which under Jewish law meant he himself was Jewish. Interesting!! (He was notorious at the time for his anti-Zionist sympathies.) In the 1990s, Hitchens was virulently, and somewhat inexplicably, hostile to President . Interesting!!! You would have thought that Clinton’s decadence — the thing that bothered other liberals and leftists the most — would have positively appealed to Hitchens. Finally and recently, he became the most (possibly the only) intellectually serious non-neocon supporter of ’s Iraq war. Interesting!!!! Where was this train heading? Possibly toward an open conversion to mainline conservatism and quick descent into cliché and demagoguery (the path chosen by Paul Johnson, a somewhat similar British character of the previous generation). But surely there was time for a few more intellectual adventures before retiring to an office at the Hoover Institution or some other nursing home of the mind. One obvious possibility stood out: Hitchens, known to be a fervid atheist, would find God and take up religion. The only question was which flavor he would choose. Embrace Islam? Too cute. Complete the half-finished Jewish script? Become a Catholic, following the path well trodden by such British writers as Waugh and Greene? Or — most daring and original — would he embrace the old Church of England (Episcopalianism in America) and spend his declining years writing about the beauty of the hymns, the essential Britishness of village churchyards, the importance of protecting religion from the dangers of excessive faith, and so on? Well, ladies and gentlemen, Hitchens is either playing the contrarian at a very high level or possibly he is even sincere. But just as he had us expecting minus X, he confounds us by reverting to X. He has written, with tremendous brio and great wit, but also with an underlying genuine anger, an all-out attack on all aspects of religion. Sometimes, instead of the word “religion,” he refers to it as “god-worship,” which, although virtually a tautology (isn’t “object of worship” almost a definition of a god?), makes the practice sound sinister and strange. Michael Kinsley is a columnist for Time magazine. Cheers For Jefferson Of Bellow and Baghdad The Independent of London THE CLOSE READER; What Would Orwell Do? new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics Mr. Perkin's Pierce Arrow, Harlem, New York, 1946 N.Y. / Region &#x00bb; No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/books/index.html Books - Review Books of The Times Reviewed by RICHARD EDER Jim Crace’s futurist nightmare, in which a cruel myth leads emigrants to slave ships, is witty, graceful and haunting. 'Bad Luck and Trouble' Reviewed by JANET MASLIN “Bad Luck and Trouble” unfolds with the simple, immaculate logic that makes Lee Child’s Jack Reacher series utterly addictive. Who Killed Kennedy? One Man’s Answer Vincent Bugliosi, of the best-selling true-crime books of all time, “Helter Skelter,” has turned his attention to the assassination of President John F. Kennedy. The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller The advance is usually the estimate of the first year's royalties. It's often wrong. Graphic: The Publishing Gamble Writing the Book on Hating the Sox By VINCENT M. MALLOZZI Author Jerome Preisler has written more than 20 thrillers, but one of his biggest thrills is writing a biweekly column, “Deep in the Red,” for YesNetwork.com. Guy Drinks. Bird Drinks. Guy Thrives. Bird Drinks. Cartoonist Tony Milionaire’s hero, Drinky Cow, swaggers into a show on the Cartoon Network. Questions for Natasha Trethewey Interview By DEBORAH SOLOMON The 41-year-old poet talks about growing up mixed-race in Mississippi, her mother’s murder and whether it’s better to remember or to forget. 'God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything' Reviewed by MICHAEL KINSLEY Christopher Hitchens is an old-fashioned (and very entertaining) village atheist, trying to pick arguments with the good citizens on their way to church. 'The Yiddish Policemen's Union' Reviewed by TERRENCE RAFFERTY Michael Chabon’s new novel is a screwball, hard-boiled whodunit set in a Jewish settlement in Alaska. A Profile of Michael Chabon 'Nixon and Kissinger: Partners in Power' Reviewed by MARK ATWOOD LAWRENCE Richard Nixon and Henry Kissinger distrusted and insulted each other, yet they worked together well. 'Some of Tim’s Stories' By S. E. HINTON Reviewed by STEPHANIE ZACHAREK New stories, and interviews, from Outsiders.” 'One Perfect Day: The Selling of the American Wedding' Reviewed by JODI KANTOR In her new book, Rebecca Mead views the excesses of the modern American wedding. A Profile of Rebecca Mead 'John Donne: The Reformed Soul' Reviewed by THOMAS MALLON A biography traces John Donne’s path from lustful Catholic poet to passionate Anglican preacher. Reviewed by CHRISTOPHER BENFEY In this thriller, murders separated by centuries are linked by Isaac Newton and his experiments with light. ‘God Is Not Great’ “Why, if god was the creator of all things, were we supposed to ‘praise’ him so incessantly for doing what came to him naturally?” ‘The Yiddish Policemen’s Union’ “‘These are strange times to be a Jew,’ Tenenboym agrees. ‘No doubt about it.’” “Nixon's postpresidential resentments were of a piece with longstanding sensitivity to personal slights.” “I have tried to tease out the truths from the untruths in that series of events that seeped out through Elizabeth's death . . .” from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 Featuring poetry, the young-adult version of "An Inconvenient Truth," comics for teens and an "almost perfect" picture book. Slide Show: Best Illustrated Books This week: Christopher Hitchens, Is Not Great”; Julie Just on children’s books; Tim Weiner on E. Howard Hunt; and Dwight Garner, senior editor, with best-seller news. Sam Tanenhaus, the editor of the Book Review, is the host. This Week's Book Review Podcast ( What future doctors (and patients) can learn from Tolstoy, Philip Roth — and “The Secret.” The Funny Pages | Sunday Serial This week, Chapter 1: As one door opens, another one closes. . . . The 10 Best Books of 2006 100 Notable Books of 2006 Best American Fiction Survey Nobel Prize in Literature Book Review Editor Responds Sign Up for the Books Update Receive a selective overview of new book reviews and features every Sunday. SEARCH BOOK REVIEWS SINCE 1981: MOST POPULAR - BOOKS Who Killed Kennedy? One Man&#8217;s Answer He&#8217;s Taut of Style and Light of Foot Children's Books: Getting Better All the Time &#8216;God Is Not Great&#8217; The Empire in the Mirror Children's Books: Swing Set Books: What You Can&#8217;t Do Empire in the Mirror Who Killed Kennedy? One Man's Answer The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller A Man, a Woman and a Day of Terror million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Explore the most luxurious homes in the U.S. Virgin Islands Explore the most luxurious homes in Hawaii Explore the most luxurious homes in France PRESIDENTS Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. Buy, sell or research a car. What movie should you see? Photos, fine art, books and more. What’s new on Broadway?
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/books/index.html?partner=rssnyt Books - Review Books of The Times Reviewed by RICHARD EDER Jim Crace’s futurist nightmare, in which a cruel myth leads emigrants to slave ships, is witty, graceful and haunting. 'Bad Luck and Trouble' Reviewed by JANET MASLIN “Bad Luck and Trouble” unfolds with the simple, immaculate logic that makes Lee Child’s Jack Reacher series utterly addictive. Who Killed Kennedy? One Man’s Answer Vincent Bugliosi, of the best-selling true-crime books of all time, “Helter Skelter,” has turned his attention to the assassination of President John F. Kennedy. The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller The advance is usually the estimate of the first year's royalties. It's often wrong. Graphic: The Publishing Gamble Writing the Book on Hating the Sox By VINCENT M. MALLOZZI Author Jerome Preisler has written more than 20 thrillers, but one of his biggest thrills is writing a biweekly column, “Deep in the Red,” for YesNetwork.com. Guy Drinks. Bird Drinks. Guy Thrives. Bird Drinks. Cartoonist Tony Milionaire’s hero, Drinky Cow, swaggers into a show on the Cartoon Network. Questions for Natasha Trethewey Interview By DEBORAH SOLOMON The 41-year-old poet talks about growing up mixed-race in Mississippi, her mother’s murder and whether it’s better to remember or to forget. 'God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything' Reviewed by MICHAEL KINSLEY Christopher Hitchens is an old-fashioned (and very entertaining) village atheist, trying to pick arguments with the good citizens on their way to church. 'The Yiddish Policemen's Union' Reviewed by TERRENCE RAFFERTY Michael Chabon’s new novel is a screwball, hard-boiled whodunit set in a Jewish settlement in Alaska. A Profile of Michael Chabon 'Nixon and Kissinger: Partners in Power' Reviewed by MARK ATWOOD LAWRENCE Richard Nixon and Henry Kissinger distrusted and insulted each other, yet they worked together well. 'Some of Tim’s Stories' By S. E. HINTON Reviewed by STEPHANIE ZACHAREK New stories, and interviews, from Outsiders.” 'One Perfect Day: The Selling of the American Wedding' Reviewed by JODI KANTOR In her new book, Rebecca Mead views the excesses of the modern American wedding. A Profile of Rebecca Mead 'John Donne: The Reformed Soul' Reviewed by THOMAS MALLON A biography traces John Donne’s path from lustful Catholic poet to passionate Anglican preacher. Reviewed by CHRISTOPHER BENFEY In this thriller, murders separated by centuries are linked by Isaac Newton and his experiments with light. ‘God Is Not Great’ “Why, if god was the creator of all things, were we supposed to ‘praise’ him so incessantly for doing what came to him naturally?” ‘The Yiddish Policemen’s Union’ “‘These are strange times to be a Jew,’ Tenenboym agrees. ‘No doubt about it.’” “Nixon's postpresidential resentments were of a piece with longstanding sensitivity to personal slights.” “I have tried to tease out the truths from the untruths in that series of events that seeped out through Elizabeth's death . . .” from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 Featuring poetry, the young-adult version of "An Inconvenient Truth," comics for teens and an "almost perfect" picture book. Slide Show: Best Illustrated Books This week: Christopher Hitchens, Is Not Great”; Julie Just on children’s books; Tim Weiner on E. Howard Hunt; and Dwight Garner, senior editor, with best-seller news. Sam Tanenhaus, the editor of the Book Review, is the host. This Week's Book Review Podcast ( What future doctors (and patients) can learn from Tolstoy, Philip Roth — and “The Secret.” The Funny Pages | Sunday Serial This week, Chapter 1: As one door opens, another one closes. . . . The 10 Best Books of 2006 100 Notable Books of 2006 Best American Fiction Survey Nobel Prize in Literature Book Review Editor Responds Sign Up for the Books Update Receive a selective overview of new book reviews and features every Sunday. SEARCH BOOK REVIEWS SINCE 1981: MOST POPULAR - BOOKS Who Killed Kennedy? One Man&#8217;s Answer He&#8217;s Taut of Style and Light of Foot Children's Books: Getting Better All the Time &#8216;God Is Not Great&#8217; The Empire in the Mirror Children's Books: Swing Set Books: What You Can&#8217;t Do Empire in the Mirror Who Killed Kennedy? One Man's Answer The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller A Man, a Woman and a Day of Terror million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Explore the most luxurious homes in the U.S. Virgin Islands Explore the most luxurious homes in Hawaii Explore the most luxurious homes in France Iwo Jima Flag-Raising Sequence - Framed Continuous coverage of business news. Buy, sell or rent a home. Photos, fine art, books and more. What’s new on Broadway? Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today.
